Marcus Aurelius - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Sources 
2 Early life Toggle Early life subsection 
2.1 Name 
2.2 Family origins 
2.3 Childhood 
2.4 Succession to Hadrian 
2.5 Heir to Antoninus Pius 138145 
2.6 Fronto and further education 
2.7 Birth and death 
2.8 Antoninus Piuss last years 
3 Emperor Toggle Emperor subsection 
3.1 Accession of Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus 161 
3.2 Early rule 
3.3 War with Parthia 161166 
3.4 War with Germanic tribes 166180 
3.5 Legal and administrative work 

3.5.1 Trade with Han China and outbreak of plague 
3.6 Death and succession 180 
4 Attitude towards Christians 
5 Marriage and issue 
6 NervaAntonine family tree 
7 Writings and legacy 
8 See also 
9 Notes 
10 Citations 
11 Bibliography Toggle Bibliography subsection 
11.1 Ancient 
11.2 Modern 
12 External links Toggle the table of contents Marcus Aurelius 105 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch nglisc  Aragons Asturianu Azrbaycanca    Bnlmg   Bikol Central   Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Estremeu Euskara  Froyskt Franais Frysk Gaeilge Gidhlig Galego Hakkng    Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua slenska Italiano    Kiswahili Kongo Kurd Latina Latvieu Lietuvi Lingua Franca Nova Magyar  Malagasy     Bahasa Melayu   Nederlands  Napulitano Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha      Piemontis Polski Portugus Romn  Scots Shqip Sicilianu Simple English Slovenina Slovenina   srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog    Trke   Ting Vit  Winaray  Yorb  Zazaki  Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikiquote Wikisource From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Roman emperor from 161 to 180 and Stoic philosopher Marcus Aurelius Marble bust Muse SaintRaymond Roman emperor Reign 7 March 161  17 March 180 Predecessor Antoninus Pius Successor Commodus Coemperor Lucius Verus 161169 Commodus 177180 Born 121042626 April 121 Rome Italia Roman Empire Died 17 March 1801800317 aged 58 Vindobona Pannonia Superior or Sirmium Pannonia Inferior Burial Hadrians Mausoleum Spouse Faustina the Younger m.145 d.175 Issue Among others Lucilla Faustina Fadilla Cornificia Faustina Minor Commodus Annius Verus Sabina Names Marcus Annius Catilius Severus birth Marcus Annius Verus 124 Marcus Aelius Aurelius Verus Caesar 138 see  Name for details Regnal name Imperator Caesar Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Augustus Dynasty NervaAntonine Father Marcus Annius Verus Antoninus Pius adoptive Mother Domitia Calvilla Philosophy career Notable work Meditations Era Hellenistic philosophy Region Western philosophy School Stoicism Main interests Ethics Notable ideas Memento mori1 Roman imperial dynasties Aureus of Marcus Aurelius NervaAntonine dynasty AD 96192 Chronology Nerva 9698 Trajan 98117 Hadrian 117138 Antoninus Pius 138161 Lucius Verus 161169 Marcus Aurelius 161180 Commodus 177192 Family NervaAntonine family tree CategoryNervaAntonine dynasty Succession Preceded by Flavian dynasty Followed by Year of the Five Emperors v t e Part of a series on Marcus Aurelius Early life Reign Parthian War Marcomannic Wars Antonine Plague Misc. Meditations Temple Column Statue v t e Marcus Aurelius Antoninus  Latin marks aurelis antonins English rilis awREElees2 26 April 121  17 March 180 was Roman emperor from 161 to 180 and a Stoic philosopher. He was a member of the NervaAntonine dynasty the last of the rulers later known as the Five Good Emperors and the last emperor of the Pax Romana an age of relative peace calm and stability for the Roman Empire lasting from 27 BC to 180 AD. He served as Roman consul in 140 145 and 161. Marcus Aurelius was the son of the praetor Marcus Annius Verus and his wife Domitia Calvilla. He was related through marriage to the emperors Trajan and Hadrian. Marcuss father died when he was three and he was raised by his mother and paternal grandfather. After Hadrians adoptive son Aelius Caesar died in 138 Hadrian adopted Marcuss uncle Antoninus Pius as his new heir. In turn Antoninus adopted Marcus and Lucius the son of Aelius. Hadrian died that year and Antoninus became emperor. Now heir to the throne Marcus studied Greek and Latin under tutors such as Herodes Atticus and Marcus Cornelius Fronto. He married Antoninuss daughter Faustina in 145. After Antoninus died in 161 Marcus Aurelius acceded to the throne alongside his adoptive brother who reigned under the name Lucius Verus. Under his rule the Roman Empire witnessed much military conflict. In the East the Romans fought the Parthian war of Lucius Verus with a revitalized Parthian Empire and the rebel Kingdom of Armenia. Marcus defeated the Marcomanni Quadi and Sarmatian Iazyges in the Marcomannic Wars. These and other Germanic peoples began to represent a troubling reality for the Empire. He reduced the silver purity of the Roman currency the denarius. The persecution of Christians in the Roman Empire appears to have increased during his reign but his involvement in this is unlikely since there is no record of early Christians in the 
2 nd century calling him a persecutor and Tertullian even called Marcus a protector of Christians.3 The Antonine Plague broke out in 165 or 166 and devastated the population of the Roman Empire causing the deaths of five to ten million people. Lucius Verus may have died from the plague in 169. Unlike some of his predecessors Marcus chose not to adopt an heir. His children included Lucilla who married Lucius and Commodus whose succession after Marcus has been a subject of debate among both contemporary and modern historians. The Column of Marcus Aurelius and Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius still stand in Rome where they were erected in celebration of his military victories. Meditations the writings of the philosopher  as contemporary biographers called Marcus  are a significant source of the modern understanding of ancient Stoic philosophy. These writings have been praised by fellow writers philosophers monarchs and politicians centuries after his death. Sourcesedit The major sources depicting the life and rule of Marcus Aurelius are patchy and frequently unreliable. The most important group of sources the biographies contained in the Historia Augusta claimed to be written by a group of authors at the turn of the 
4 th century AD but it is believed they were in fact written by a single author referred to here as the biographer from about 3
95.4  The later biographies and the biographies of subordinate emperors and usurpers are unreliable but the earlier biographies derived primarily from nowlost earlier sources Marius Maximus or Ignotus are considered to be more accurate.5 For Marcuss life and rule the biographies of Hadrian Antoninus Marcus and Lucius are largely reliable but those of Aelius Verus and Avidius Cassius are not.6 A body of correspondence between Marcuss tutor Fronto and various Antonine officials survives in a series of patchy manuscripts covering the period from c. 138 to 1
66.7 8 Marcuss own Meditations offer a window on his inner life but are largely undateable and make few specific references to worldly affairs.9 The main narrative source for the period is Cassius Dio a Greek senator from Bithynian Nicaea who wrote a history of Rome from its founding to 229 in eighty books. Dio is vital for the military history of the period but his senatorial prejudices and strong opposition to imperial expansion obscure his perspective.10 Some other literary sources provide specific details the writings of the physician Galen on the habits of the Antonine elite the orations of Aelius Aristides on the temper of the times and the constitutions preserved in the Digest and Codex Justinianeus on Marcuss legal work.11 Inscriptions and coin finds supplement the literary sources.12 Early lifeedit Main article Early life of Marcus Aurelius Nameedit Marcus was born in Rome on 26 April 121. His birth name is sometimes given as Marcus Annius Verus13 but sources assign this name to him upon his fathers death and unofficial adoption by his grandfather upon his coming of age.14151617 He may have been known as Marcus Annius Catilius Severus141518 at birth or some point in his youth17 or Marcus Catilius Severus Annius Verus. Upon his adoption by Antoninus as heir to the throne he was known as Marcus Aelius Aurelius Verus Caesar and upon his ascension he was Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Augustus until his death19 Epiphanius of Salamis in his chronology of the Roman emperors included in his On Weights and Measures calls him Marcus Aurelius Verus.20 Family originsedit The father of Marcus Aurelius was Marcus Annius Verus III.21 The Anni Veri were a Roman family settled in the small colony of Ucubi Colonia Claritas Iulia Ucubi southeast of Crdoba in Iberian Baetica modern Andalusia Spain they were of Italic origins and had legendary claims of descendance from Numa Pompilius.2223 The Anni Veri rose to prominence in Rome in the late 
1 st century AD. Marcuss greatgrandfather Marcus Annius Verus I was a senator and according to the Historia Augusta expraetor his grandfather Marcus Annius Verus II was made patrician in 73
74.2 4 Through his grandmother Rupilia Faustina Marcus was related to the NervaAntonine dynasty Rupilla was the stepdaughter of Salonia Matidia who was the niece of the emperor Trajan.25
26 note 1 Marcuss mother Domitia Lucilla Minor also known as Domitia Calvilla was the daughter of the Roman patrician P. Calvisius Tullus and inherited a great fortune described at length in one of Plinys letters from her parents and grandparents. Her inheritance included large brickworks on the outskirts of Rome  a profitable enterprise in an era when the city was experiencing a construction boom  and the Horti Domitia Calvillae or Lucillae a villa on the Caelian hill of Rome.3132 Marcus himself was born and raised in the Horti and referred to the Caelian hill as My Caelian.333435 The adoptive family of Marcus was the gens Aurelia an old Roman gens.36 His adoptive father Antoninus Pius came from the Aurelii Fulvi a branch of the Aurelii settled in the colony of Nemausus in Roman Gaul.37 Childhoodedit Marcuss sister Annia Cornificia Faustina was probably born in 122 or 1
23.3 8 His father probably died in 124 when Marcus was three years old during his praetorship.
39 note 2 Though he can hardly have known his father Marcus wrote in his Meditations that he had learned modesty and manliness from his memories of his father and the mans posthumous reputation.41 His mother Lucilla did not remarry39 and following prevailing aristocratic customs probably did not spend much time with her son. Instead Marcus was in the care of nurses42 and was raised after his fathers death by his grandfather Marcus Annius Verus II who had always retained the legal authority of patria potestas over his son and grandson. Technically this was not an adoption the creation of a new and different patria potestas. Lucius Catilius Severus described as Marcuss maternal greatgrandfather also participated in his upbringing he was probably the elder Domitia Lucillas stepfather.17 Marcus was raised in his parents home on the Caelian Hill an upscale area with few public buildings but many aristocratic villas. Marcuss grandfather owned a palace beside the Lateran where he would spend much of his childhood.43 Marcus thanks his grandfather for teaching him good character and avoidance of bad temper.44 He was less fond of the mistress his grandfather took and lived with after the death of his wife Rupilia.45 Marcus was grateful that he did not have to live with her longer than he did.46 A bust of young Marcus Aurelius Capitoline Museum. Anthony Birley his modern biographer writes of the bust This is certainly a grave young man.47 From a young age Marcus displayed enthusiasm for wrestling and boxing. He trained in wrestling as a youth and into his teenage years learned to fight in armour and joined the Salii an order of priests dedicated to the god Mars that were responsible for the sacred shields called Ancilia and possibly for heralding war seasons beginning and end. Marcus was educated at home in line with contemporary aristocratic trends48 he thanks Catilius Severus for encouraging him to avoid public schools.49 One of his teachers Diognetus a painting master proved particularly influential he seems to have introduced Marcus Aurelius to the philosophic way of life.50 In April 132 at the behest of Diognetus Marcus took up the dress and habits of the philosopher he studied while wearing a rough Greek cloak and would sleep on the ground until his mother convinced him to sleep on a bed.51 A new set of tutors  the Homeric scholar Alexander of Cotiaeum along with Trosius Aper and Tuticius Proculus teachers of Latin
52 note 3  took over Marcuss education in about 132 or 1
33.5 4 Marcus thanks Alexander for his training in literary styling.55 Alexanders influence  an emphasis on matter over style and careful wording with the occasional Homeric quotation  has been detected in Marcuss Meditations.56 Succession to Hadrianedit In late 136 Hadrian almost died from a hemorrhage. Convalescent in his villa at Tivoli he selected Lucius Ceionius Commodus Marcuss intended fatherinlaw as his successor and adopted son57 according to the biographer against the wishes of everyone.58 While his motives are not certain it would appear that his goal was to eventually place the thentooyoung Marcus on the throne.59 As part of his adoption Commodus took the name Lucius Aelius Caesar. His health was so poor that during a ceremony to mark his becoming heir to the throne he was too weak to lift a large shield on his own.60 After a brief stationing on the Danube frontier Aelius returned to Rome to make an address to the Senate on the first day of 138. However the night before the scheduled speech he grew ill and died of a hemorrhage later in the day.
61 note 4 Coin AD 136138 of Hadrian obverse and his adoptive son Lucius Aelius reverse. Hadrian is wearing the laurel crown. Inscription HADRIANVS ...  LVCIVS CAESAR. On 24 January 138 Hadrian selected Aurelius Antoninus the husband of Marcuss aunt Faustina the Elder as his new successor.63 As part of Hadrians terms Antoninus in turn adopted Marcus and Lucius Commodus the son of Lucius Aelius.64 Marcus became M. Aelius Aurelius Verus and Lucius became L. Aelius Aurelius Commodus. At Hadrians request Antoninuss daughter Faustina was betrothed to Lucius.65 Marcus reportedly greeted the news that Hadrian had become his adoptive grandfather with sadness instead of joy. Only with reluctance did he move from his mothers house on the Caelian to Hadrians private home.66 At some time in 138 Hadrian requested in the Senate that Marcus be exempt from the law barring him from becoming quaestor before his twentyfourth birthday. The Senate complied and Marcus served under Antoninus the consul for 1
39.6 7 Marcuss adoption diverted him from the typical career path of his class. If not for his adoption he probably would have become triumvir monetalis a highly regarded post involving token administration of the state mint after that he could have served as tribune with a legion becoming the legions nominal secondincommand. Marcus probably would have opted for travel and further education instead. As it was Marcus was set apart from his fellow citizens. Nonetheless his biographer attests that his character remained unaffected He still showed the same respect to his relations as he had when he was an ordinary citizen and he was as thrifty and careful of his possessions as he had been when he lived in a private household.68 After a series of suicide attempts all thwarted by Antoninus Hadrian left for Baiae a seaside resort on the Campanian coast. His condition did not improve and he abandoned the diet prescribed by his doctors indulging himself in food and drink. He sent for Antoninus who was at his side when he died on 10 July 1
38.6 9 His remains were buried quietly at Puteoli.70 The succession to Antoninus was peaceful and stable Antoninus kept Hadrians nominees in office and appeased the senate respecting its privileges and commuting the death sentences of men charged in Hadrians last days.71 For his dutiful behaviour Antoninus was asked to accept the name Pius.72 Heir to Antoninus Pius 1381
45 edit Sestertius of Antoninus Pius AD 140144. It celebrates the betrothal of Marcus Aurelius and Faustina the Younger in 139 pictured below Antoninus who is holding a statuette of Concordia and clasping hands with Faustina the Elder. Inscription ANTONINVS AVG. PIVS P. P. TR. P. CONS. III  CONCORDIAE S.C.73 Denarius of Antoninus Pius AD 139 with a portrait of Marcus Aurelius on the reverse. Inscription ANTONINVS AVG. PIVS P. P.  AVRELIVS CAES. AVG. PII F. CONS. DES.74 Immediately after Hadrians death Antoninus approached Marcus and requested that his marriage arrangements be amended Marcuss betrothal to Ceionia Fabia would be annulled and he would be betrothed to Faustina Antoninuss daughter instead. Faustinas betrothal to Ceionias brother Lucius Commodus would also have to be annulled. Marcus consented to Antoninuss proposal.75 He was made consul for 140 with Antoninus as his colleague and was appointed as a sevir one of the knights six commanders at the orders annual parade on 15 July 139. As the heir apparent Marcus became princeps iuventutis head of the equestrian order. He now took the name Marcus Aelius Aurelius Verus Caesar.76 Marcus would later caution himself against taking the name too seriously See that you do not turn into a Caesar do not be dipped into the purple dye  for that can happen.77 At the senates request Marcus joined all the priestly colleges pontifices augures quindecimviri sacris faciundis septemviri epulonum etc.78 direct evidence for membership however is available only for the Arval Brethren.79 Antoninus demanded that Marcus reside in the House of Tiberius the imperial palace on the Palatine and take up the habits of his new station the aulicum fastigium or pomp of the court against Marcuss objections.78 Marcus would struggle to reconcile the life of the court with his philosophic yearnings. He told himself it was an attainable goal  Where life is possible then it is possible to live the right life life is possible in a palace so it is possible to live the right life in a palace80  but he found it difficult nonetheless. He would criticize himself in the Meditations for abusing court life in front of company.81 As quaestor Marcus would have had little real administrative work to do. He would read imperial letters to the senate when Antoninus was absent and would do secretarial work for the senators.82 But he felt drowned in paperwork and complained to his tutor Marcus Cornelius Fronto I am so out of breath from dictating nearly thirty letters.83 He was being fitted for ruling the state in the words of his biographer.84 He was required to make a speech to the assembled senators as well making oratorical training essential for the job.85 On 1 January 145 Marcus was made consul a second time. Fronto urged him in a letter to have plenty of sleep so that you may come into the Senate with a good colour and read your speech with a strong voice.86 Marcus had complained of an illness in an earlier letter As far as my strength is concerned I am beginning to get it back and there is no trace of the pain in my chest. But that ulcer ...note 5 I am having treatment and taking care not to do anything that interferes with it.87 Never particularly healthy or strong Marcus was praised by Cassius Dio writing of his later years for behaving dutifully in spite of his various illnesses.88 In April 145 Marcus married Faustina legally his sister as had been planned since 1
38.8 9 Little is specifically known of the ceremony but the biographer calls it noteworthy.90 Coins were issued with the heads of the couple and Antoninus as Pontifex Maximus would have officiated. Marcus makes no apparent reference to the marriage in his surviving letters and only sparing references to Faustina.91 Fronto and further educationedit After taking the toga virilis in 136 Marcus probably began his training in oratory.92 He had three tutors in Greek Aninus Macer Caninius Celer and Herodes Atticus and one in Latin Marcus Cornelius Fronto. The latter two were the most esteemed orators of their time93 but probably did not become his tutors until his adoption by Antoninus in 138. The preponderance of Greek tutors indicates the importance of the Greek language to the aristocracy of Rome.94 This was the age of the Second Sophistic a renaissance in Greek letters. Although educated in Rome in his Meditations Marcus would write his inmost thoughts in Greek.95 Atticus was controversial an enormously rich Athenian probably the richest man in the eastern half of the empire he was quick to anger and resented by his fellow Athenians for his patronizing manner.96 Atticus was an inveterate opponent of Stoicism and philosophic pretensions.97 He thought the Stoics desire for apatheia was foolish they would live a sluggish enervated life he said.98 In spite of the influence of Atticus Marcus would later become a Stoic. He would not mention Herodes at all in his Meditations in spite of the fact that they would come into contact many times over the following decades.99 Fronto was highly esteemed in the selfconsciously antiquarian world of Latin letters100 he was thought of as second only to Cicero perhaps even an alternative to him.1
01 note 6 He did not care much for Atticus though Marcus was eventually to put the pair on speaking terms. Fronto exercised a complete mastery of Latin capable of tracing expressions through the literature producing obscure synonyms and challenging minor improprieties in word choice.101 A significant amount of the correspondence between Fronto and Marcus has survived.105 The pair were very close using intimate language such as Farewell my Fronto wherever you are my most sweet love and delight. How is it between you and me I love you and you are not here in their correspondence.106 Marcus spent time with Frontos wife and daughter both named Cratia and they enjoyed light conversation.107 He wrote Fronto a letter on his birthday claiming to love him as he loved himself and calling on the gods to ensure that every word he learnt of literature he would learn from the lips of Fronto.108 His prayers for Frontos health were more than conventional because Fronto was frequently ill at times he seems to be an almost constant invalid always suffering109  about onequarter of the surviving letters deal with the mans sicknesses.110 Marcus asks that Frontos pain be inflicted on himself of my own accord with every kind of discomfort.111 Fronto never became Marcuss fulltime teacher and continued his career as an advocate. One notorious case brought him into conflict with Atticus.112 Marcus pleaded with Fronto first with advice then as a favour not to attack Atticus he had already asked Atticus to refrain from making the first blows.113 Fronto replied that he was surprised to discover Marcus counted Atticus as a friend perhaps Atticus was not yet Marcuss tutor and allowed that Marcus might be correct114 but nonetheless affirmed his intent to win the case by any means necessary The charges are frightful and must be spoken of as frightful. Those in particular that refer to the beating and robbing I will describe so that they savour of gall and bile. If I happen to call him an uneducated little Greek it will not mean war to the death.115 The outcome of the trial is unknown.116 By the age of twentyfive between April 146 and April 147 Marcus had grown disaffected with his studies in jurisprudence and showed some signs of general malaise. His master he writes to Fronto was an unpleasant blowhard and had made a hit at him It is easy to sit yawning next to a judge he says but to be a judge is noble work.117 Marcus had grown tired of his exercises of taking positions in imaginary debates. When he criticized the insincerity of conventional language Fronto took to defend it.118 In any case Marcuss formal education was now over. He had kept his teachers on good terms following them devotedly. It affected his health adversely his biographer writes to have devoted so much effort to his studies. It was the only thing the biographer could find fault with in Marcuss entire boyhood.119 Fronto had warned Marcus against the study of philosophy early on It is better never to have touched the teaching of philosophy ... than to have tasted it superficially with the edge of the lips as the saying is.120 He disdained philosophy and philosophers and looked down on Marcuss sessions with Apollonius of Chalcedon and others in this circle.105 Fronto put an uncharitable interpretation of Marcuss conversion to philosophy In the fashion of the young tired of boring work Marcus had turned to philosophy to escape the constant exercises of oratorical training.121 Marcus kept in close touch with Fronto but would ignore Frontos scruples.122 Apollonius may have introduced Marcus to Stoic philosophy but Quintus Junius Rusticus would have the strongest influence on the boy.1
23 note 7 He was the man Fronto recognized as having wooed Marcus away from oratory.125 He was older than Fronto and twenty years older than Marcus. As the grandson of Arulenus Rusticus one of the martyrs to the tyranny of Domitian r. 8196 he was heir to the tradition of Stoic Opposition to the bad emperors of the 
1 st century126 the true successor of Seneca as opposed to Fronto the false one.127 Marcus thanks Rusticus for teaching him not to be led astray into enthusiasm for rhetoric for writing on speculative themes for discoursing on moralizing texts.... To avoid oratory poetry and fine writing.128 Philostratus describes how even when Marcus was an old man in the latter part of his reign he studied under Sextus of Chaeronea The Emperor Marcus was an eager disciple of Sextus the Boeotian philosopher being often in his company and frequenting his house. Lucius who had just come to Rome asked the Emperor whom he met on his way where he was going to and on what errand and Marcus answered  it is good even for an old man to learn I am now on my way to Sextus the philosopher to learn what I do not yet know. And Lucius raising his hand to heaven said  O Zeus the king of the Romans in his old age takes up his tablets and goes to school.129 Birth and deathedit On 30 November 147 Faustina gave birth to a girl named Domitia Faustina. She was the first of at least thirteen children including two sets of twins that Faustina would bear over the next twentythree years. The next day 1 December Antoninus gave Marcus the tribunician power and the imperium  authority over the armies and provinces of the emperor. As tribune he had the right to bring one measure before the senate after the four Antoninus could introduce. His tribunician powers would be renewed with Antoninuss on 10 December 1
47.1 30 The first mention of Domitia in Marcuss letters reveals her as a sickly infant. Caesar to Fronto. If the gods are willing we seem to have a hope of recovery. The diarrhea has stopped the little attacks of fever have been driven away. But the emaciation is still extreme and there is still quite a bit of coughing. He and Faustina Marcus wrote had been pretty occupied with the girls care.131 Domitia would die in 1
51.1 32 The Mausoleum of Hadrian where the children of Marcus and Faustina were buried In 149 Faustina gave birth again to twin sons. Contemporary coinage commemorates the event with crossed cornucopiae beneath portrait busts of the two small boys and the legend temporum felicitas the happiness of the times. They did not survive long. Before the end of the year another family coin was issued it shows only a tiny girl Domitia Faustina and one boy baby. Then another the girl alone. The infants were buried in the Mausoleum of Hadrian where their epitaphs survive. They were called Titus Aurelius Antoninus and Tiberius Aelius Aurelius.133 Marcus steadied himself One man prays How I may not lose my little child but you must pray How I may not be afraid to lose him.134 He quoted from the Iliad what he called the briefest and most familiar saying ... enough to dispel sorrow and fear135 leaves the wind scatters some on the face of the ground like unto them are the children of men.  Iliad vi.146135 Another daughter was born on 7 March 150 Annia Aurelia Galeria Lucilla. At some time between 155 and 161 probably soon after 155 Marcuss mother Domitia Lucilla died.136 Faustina probably had another daughter in 151 but the child Annia Galeria Aurelia Faustina might not have been born until 1
53.1 37 Another son Tiberius Aelius Antoninus was born in 152. A coin issue celebrates fecunditati Augustae to Augustas fertility depicting two girls and an infant. The boy did not survive long as evidenced by coins from 156 only depicting the two girls. He might have died in 152 the same year as Marcuss sister Cornificia.138 By 28 March 158 when Marcus replied another of his children was dead. Marcus thanked the temple synod even though this turned out otherwise. The childs name is unknown.139 In 159 and 160 Faustina gave birth to daughters Fadilla and Cornificia named respectively after Faustinas and Marcuss dead sisters.140 Antoninus Piuss last yearsedit Bust of Antoninus Pius British Museum Lucius started his political career as a quaestor in 153. He was consul in 154141 and was consul again with Marcus in 1
61.1 42 Lucius had no other titles except that of son of Augustus. Lucius had a markedly different personality from Marcus he enjoyed sports of all kinds but especially hunting and wrestling he took obvious pleasure in the circus games and gladiatorial fights.1
43 note 8 He did not marry until 1
64.1 47 In 156 Antoninus turned 70. He found it difficult to keep himself upright without stays. He started nibbling on dry bread to give him the strength to stay awake through his morning receptions. As Antoninus aged Marcus would take on more administrative duties more still when he became the praetorian prefect an office that was as much secretarial as military when Marcus Gavius Maximus died in 156 or 1
57.1 48 In 160 Marcus and Lucius were designated joint consuls for the following year. Antoninus may have already been ill.140 Two days before his death the biographer reports Antoninus was at his ancestral estate at Lorium in Etruria149 about 19 kilometres 12 mi from Rome.150 He ate Alpine cheese at dinner quite greedily. In the night he vomited he had a fever the next day. The day after that 7 March 161151 he summoned the imperial council and passed the state and his daughter to Marcus. The emperor gave the keynote to his life in the last word that he uttered when the tribune of the nightwatch came to ask the password  aequanimitas equanimity.152 He then turned over as if going to sleep and died.153 His death closed out the longest reign since Augustus surpassing Tiberius by a couple of months.154 Emperoredit Main article Reign of Marcus Aurelius Accession of Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus 1
61 edit Busts of the coemperors Marcus Aurelius left and Lucius Verus right British Museum After Antoninus died in 161 Marcus was effectively sole ruler of the Empire. The formalities of the position would follow. The Senate would soon grant him the name Augustus and the title imperator and he would soon be formally elected as pontifex maximus chief priest of the official cults. Marcus made some show of resistance the biographer writes that he was compelled to take imperial power.155 This may have been a genuine horror imperii fear of imperial power. Marcus with his preference for the philosophic life found the imperial office unappealing. His training as a Stoic however had made the choice clear to him that it was his duty.156 Although Marcus showed no personal affection for Hadrian significantly he does not thank him in the first book of his Meditations he presumably believed it his duty to enact the mans succession plans.157 Thus although the Senate planned to confirm Marcus alone he refused to take office unless Lucius received equal powers.158 The Senate accepted granting Lucius the imperium the tribunician power and the title Augustus.159 Marcus became in official titulature Imperator Caesar Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Augustus Lucius forgoing his name Commodus and taking Marcuss family name Verus became Imperator Caesar Lucius Aurelius Verus Augustus.1
60 note 9 It was the first time that Rome was ruled by two emperors.1
63 note 10 In spite of their nominal equality Marcus held more auctoritas or authority than Lucius. He had been consul once more than Lucius he had shared in Antoninuss rule and he alone was pontifex maximus.164 It would have been clear to the public which emperor was the more senior.163 As the biographer wrote Verus obeyed Marcus ... as a lieutenant obeys a proconsul or a governor obeys the emperor.165 Immediately after their Senate confirmation the emperors proceeded to the Castra Praetoria the camp of the Praetorian Guard. Lucius addressed the assembled troops which then acclaimed the pair as imperatores. Then like every new emperor since Claudius Lucius promised the troops a special donativum.166 This donative however was twice the size of those past 20000 sesterces 5000 denarii per capita with more to officers. In return for this bounty equivalent to several years pay the troops swore an oath to protect the emperors.167 The ceremony was perhaps not entirely necessary given that Marcuss accession had been peaceful and unopposed but it was good insurance against later military troubles.168 Upon his accession he also devalued the Roman currency. He decreased the silver purity of the denarius from 
83.5  to 79  the silver weight dropping from 
2.6 8 g 
0.0 95 oz to 
2.5 7 g 
0.0 91 oz.169 Antoninuss funeral ceremonies were in the words of the biographer elaborate.170 If his funeral followed those of his predecessors his body would have been cremated on a pyre at the Campus Martius and his spirit would have been seen as ascending to the gods home in the heavens. Marcus and Lucius nominated their father for deification. In contrast to their behaviour during Antoninuss campaign to deify Hadrian the Senate did not oppose the emperors wishes. A flamen or cultic priest was appointed to minister the cult of the deified Divus Antoninus. Antoninuss remains were laid to rest in Hadrians mausoleum beside the remains of Marcuss children and of Hadrian himself.171 The temple he had dedicated to his wife Diva Faustina became the Temple of Antoninus and Faustina. It survives as the church of San Lorenzo in Miranda.168 In accordance with his will Antoninuss fortune passed on to Faustina.172 Marcus had little need of his wifes fortune. Indeed at his accession Marcus transferred part of his mothers estate to his nephew Ummius Quadratus.173 Faustina was three months pregnant at her husbands accession. During the pregnancy she dreamed of giving birth to two serpents one fiercer than the other.174 On 31 August she gave birth at Lanuvium to twins T. Aurelius Fulvus Antoninus and Lucius Aurelius Commodus.1
75 note 11 Aside from the fact that the twins shared Caligulas birthday the omens were favorable and the astrologers drew positive horoscopes for the children.177 The births were celebrated on the imperial coinage.178 Early ruleedit Soon after the emperors accession Marcuss elevenyearold daughter Annia Lucilla was betrothed to Lucius in spite of the fact that he was formally her uncle.179 At the ceremonies commemorating the event new provisions were made for the support of poor children along the lines of earlier imperial foundations.180 Marcus and Lucius proved popular with the people of Rome who strongly approved of their civiliter lacking pomp behaviour. The emperors permitted free speech evidenced by the fact that the comedy writer Marullus was able to criticize them without suffering retribution. As the biographer wrote No one missed the lenient ways of Pius.181 Marcus replaced a number of the empires major officials. The ab epistulis Sextus Caecilius Crescens Volusianus in charge of the imperial correspondence was replaced with Titus Varius Clemens. Clemens was from the frontier province of Pannonia and had served in the war in Mauretania. Recently he had served as procurator of five provinces. He was a man suited for a time of military crisis.182 Lucius Volusius Maecianus Marcuss former tutor had been prefectural governor of Egypt at Marcuss accession. Maecianus was recalled made senator and appointed prefect of the treasury aerarium Saturni. He was made consul soon after.183 Frontos soninlaw Gaius Aufidius Victorinus was appointed governor of Germania Superior.184 Fronto returned to his Roman townhouse at dawn on 28 March having left his home in Cirta as soon as news of his pupils accession reached him. He sent a note to the imperial freedman Charilas asking if he could call on the emperors. Fronto would later explain that he had not dared to write the emperors directly.185 The tutor was immensely proud of his students. Reflecting on the speech he had written on taking his consulship in 143 when he had praised the young Marcus Fronto was ebullient There was then an outstanding natural ability in you there is now perfected excellence. There was then a crop of growing corn there is now a ripe gathered harvest. What I was hoping for then I have now. The hope has become a reality.186 Fronto called on Marcus alone neither thought to invite Lucius.187 Lucius was less esteemed by Fronto than his brother as his interests were on a lower level. Lucius asked Fronto to adjudicate in a dispute he and his friend Calpurnius were having on the relative merits of two actors.188 Marcus told Fronto of his reading  Coelius and a little Cicero  and his family. His daughters were in Rome with their greatgreataunt Matidia Marcus thought the evening air of the country was too cold for them. He asked Fronto for some particularly eloquent reading matter something of your own or Cato or Cicero or Sallust or Gracchus  or some poet for I need distraction especially in this kind of way by reading something that will uplift and diffuse my pressing anxieties.189 Marcuss early reign proceeded smoothly he was able to give himself wholly to philosophy and the pursuit of popular affection.190 Soon however he would find he had many anxieties. It would mean the end of the felicitas temporum happy times that the coinage of 161 had proclaimed.191 Tiber Island seen at a fortyyear highwater mark of the Tiber December 2008 In either autumn 161 or spring 1
62 note 12 the Tiber overflowed its banks flooding much of Rome. It drowned many animals leaving the city in famine. Marcus and Lucius gave the crisis their personal attention.1
93 note 13 In other times of famine the emperors are said to have provided for the Italian communities out of the Roman granaries.195 Marcus Aurelius distributing bread to the people. Painting by JosephMarie Vien 1765. Frontos letters continued through Marcuss early reign. Fronto felt that because of Marcuss prominence and public duties lessons were more important now than they had ever been before. He believed Marcus was beginning to feel the wish to be eloquent once more in spite of having for a time lost interest in eloquence.196 Fronto would again remind his pupil of the tension between his role and his philosophic pretensions Suppose Caesar that you can attain to the wisdom of Cleanthes and Zeno yet against your will not the philosophers woolen cape.197 The early days of Marcuss reign were the happiest of Frontos life Marcus was beloved by the people of Rome an excellent emperor a fond pupil and perhaps most importantly as eloquent as could be wished.198 Marcus had displayed rhetorical skill in his speech to the senate after an earthquake at Cyzicus. It had conveyed the drama of the disaster and the Senate had been awed Not more suddenly or violently was the city stirred by the earthquake than the minds of your hearers by your speech. Fronto was hugely pleased.199 War with Parthia 1611
66 edit Main article RomanParthian War of 161166 See also RomanPersian Wars Coin of Vologases IV of Parthia. Inscription above    right   left   below  Greek inscription for KING OF KINGS  ARSAKIS VOLAGASES  ILLUSTRIUS PHILELLENE. Year     474  162163. On his deathbed Antoninus spoke of nothing but the state and the foreign kings who had wronged him.200 One of those kings Vologases IV of Parthia made his move in late summer or early autumn 1
61.2 01 Vologases entered the Kingdom of Armenia then a Roman client state expelled its king and installed his own  Pacorus an Arsacid like himself.202 The governor of Cappadocia the frontline in all Armenian conflicts was Marcus Sedatius Severianus a Gaul with much experience in military matters.203 Convinced by the prophet Alexander of Abonoteichus that he could defeat the Parthians easily and win glory for himself204 Severianus led a legion perhaps the IX Hispana205 into Armenia but was trapped by the great Parthian general Chosrhoes at Elegeia a town just beyond the Cappadocian frontiers high up past the headwaters of the Euphrates. After Severianus made some unsuccessful efforts to engage Chosrhoes he committed suicide and his legion was massacred. The campaign had lasted only three days.206 There was threat of war on other frontiers as well  in Britain and in Raetia and Upper Germany where the Chatti of the Taunus mountains had recently crossed over the limes.207 Marcus was unprepared. Antoninus seems to have given him no military experience the biographer writes that Marcus spent the whole of Antoninuss twentythreeyear reign at his emperors side and not in the provinces where most previous emperors had spent their early careers.2
08 note 14 More bad news arrived the Syrian governors army had been defeated by the Parthians and retreated in disarray.210 Reinforcements were dispatched for the Parthian frontier. P. Julius Geminius Marcianus an African senator commanding X Gemina at Vindobona Vienna left for Cappadocia with detachments from the Danubian legions.211 Three full legions were also sent east I Minervia from Bonn in Upper Germany212 II Adiutrix from Aquincum213 and V Macedonica from Troesmis.214 The northern frontiers were strategically weakened frontier governors were told to avoid conflict wherever possible.215 M. Annius Libo Marcuss first cousin was sent to replace the Syrian governor. His first consulship was in 161 so he was probably in his early thirties216 and as a patrician he lacked military experience. Marcus had chosen a reliable man rather than a talented one.217 Aureus of Marcus Aurelius AD 166. On the reverse Victoria is holding a shield inscribed VICtoria PARthica referring to his victory against the Parthians. Inscription M. ANTONINVS AVG.  TR. P. XX IMP. IIII CONS. III.218 Marcus took a fourday public holiday at Alsium a resort town on the coast of Etruria. He was too anxious to relax. Writing to Fronto he declared that he would not speak about his holiday.219 Fronto replied What Do I not know that you went to Alsium with the intention of devoting yourself to games joking and complete leisure for four whole days220 He encouraged Marcus to rest calling on the example of his predecessors Antoninus had enjoyed exercise in the palaestra fishing and comedy221 going so far as to write up a fable about the gods division of the day between morning and evening  Marcus had apparently been spending most of his evenings on judicial matters instead of at leisure.222 Marcus could not take Frontos advice. I have duties hanging over me that can hardly be begged off he wrote back.223 Marcus Aurelius put on Frontos voice to chastise himself Much good has my advice done you you will say He had rested and would rest often but this devotion to duty Who knows better than you how demanding it is224 The dissolute Syrian army spent more time in Antiochs openair taverns than with their units225 engraving by William Miller after a drawing by H. Warren from a sketch by Captain Byam Martin R.N. 1866. The Euphrates River near Raqqa Syria Fronto sent Marcus a selection of reading material226 and to settle his unease over the course of the Parthian war a long and considered letter full of historical references. In modern editions of Frontos works it is labeled De bello Parthico On the Parthian War. There had been reverses in Romes past Fronto writes227 but in the end Romans had always prevailed over their enemies Always and everywhere Mars has changed our troubles into successes and our terrors into triumphs.228 Over the winter of 161162 news that a rebellion was brewing in Syria arrived and it was decided that Lucius should direct the Parthian war in person. He was stronger and healthier than Marcus the argument went and thus more suited to military activity.229 Luciuss biographer suggests ulterior motives to restrain Luciuss debaucheries to make him thrifty to reform his morals by the terror of war and to realize that he was an emperor.2
30 note 15 Whatever the case the senate gave its assent and in the summer of 162 Lucius left. Marcus would remain in Rome as the city demanded the presence of an emperor.232 Lucius spent most of the campaign in Antioch though he wintered at Laodicea and summered at Daphne a resort just outside Antioch.233 Critics declaimed Luciuss luxurious lifestyle234 saying that he had taken to gambling would dice the whole night through235 and enjoyed the company of actors.2
36 note 16 Libo died early in the war perhaps Lucius had murdered him.238 Marble statue of Lucilla AD 150200 Bardo National Museum Tunisia In the middle of the war perhaps in autumn 163 or early 164 Lucius made a trip to Ephesus to be married to Marcuss daughter Lucilla.239 Marcus moved up the date perhaps he had already heard of Luciuss mistress Panthea.240 Lucillas thirteenth birthday was in March 163 whatever the date of her marriage she was not yet fifteen.241 Lucilla was accompanied by her mother Faustina and Luciuss uncle his fathers halfbrother M. Vettulenus Civica Barbarus242 who was made comes Augusti companion of the emperors. Marcus may have wanted Civica to watch over Lucius the job Libo had failed at.243 Marcus may have planned to accompany them all the way to Smyrna the biographer says he told the senate he would but this did not happen.244 He only accompanied the group as far as Brundisium where they boarded a ship for the east.245 He returned to Rome immediately thereafter and sent out special instructions to his proconsuls not to give the group any official reception.246 The Armenian capital Artaxata was captured in 1
63.2 47 At the end of the year Lucius took the title Armeniacus despite having never seen combat Marcus declined to accept the title until the following year.248 When Lucius was hailed as imperator again however Marcus did not hesitate to take the Imperator II with him.249 Occupied Armenia was reconstructed on Roman terms. In 164 a new capital Kaine Polis New City replaced Artaxata.250 A new king was installed a Roman senator of consular rank and Arsacid descent Gaius Julius Sohaemus. He may not even have been crowned in Armenia the ceremony may have taken place in Antioch or even Ephesus.251 Sohaemus was hailed on the imperial coinage of 164 under the legend Rex armeniis Datus Lucius sat on a throne with his staff while Sohaemus stood before him saluting the emperor.252 In 163 the Parthians intervened in Osroene a Roman client in upper Mesopotamia centred on Edessa and installed their own king on its throne.253 In response Roman forces were moved downstream to cross the Euphrates at a more southerly point.254 Before the end of 163 however Roman forces had moved north to occupy Dausara and Nicephorium on the northern Parthian bank.255 Soon after the conquest of the north bank of the Euphrates other Roman forces moved on Osroene from Armenia taking Anthemusia a town southwest of Edessa.256 In 165 Roman forces moved on Mesopotamia. Edessa was reoccupied and Mannus the king deposed by the Parthians was reinstalled.257 The Parthians retreated to Nisibis but this too was besieged and captured. The Parthian army dispersed in the Tigris.258 A second force under Avidius Cassius and the III Gallica moved down the Euphrates and fought a major battle at Dura.259 By the end of the year Cassiuss army had reached the twin metropolises of Mesopotamia Seleucia on the right bank of the Tigris and Ctesiphon on the left. Ctesiphon was taken and its royal palace set to flame. The citizens of Seleucia still largely Greek the city had been commissioned and settled as a capital of the Seleucid Empire one of Alexander the Greats successor kingdoms opened its gates to the invaders. The city was sacked nonetheless leaving a black mark on Luciuss reputation. Excuses were sought or invented the official version had it that the Seleucids broke faith first.260 Cassiuss army although suffering from a shortage of supplies and the effects of a plague contracted in Seleucia made it back to Roman territory safely.261 Lucius took the title Parthicus Maximus and he and Marcus were hailed as imperatores again earning the title imp. III.262 Cassiuss army returned to the field in 166 crossing over the Tigris into Media. Lucius took the title Medicus263 and the emperors were again hailed as imperatores becoming imp. IV in imperial titulature. Marcus took the Parthicus Maximus now after another tactful delay.264 On 12 October of that year Marcus proclaimed two of his sons Annius and Commodus as his heirs.265 War with Germanic tribes 1661
80 edit Main article Marcomannic Wars Scenes from the Marcomannic Wars 176180 bas reliefs from the Arch of Marcus Aurelius now in the Capitoline Museums Marcus Aurelius receiving the submission of the vanquished with raised vexillum standards Marcus Aurelius celebrating his triumph over Romes enemies in 176 riding in a quadriga chariot During the early 1
60 s Frontos soninlaw Victorinus was stationed as a legate in Germany. He was there with his wife and children another child had stayed with Fronto and his wife in Rome.266 The condition on the northern frontier looked grave. A frontier post had been destroyed and it looked like all the peoples of central and northern Europe were in turmoil. There was corruption among the officers Victorinus had to ask for the resignation of a legionary legate who was taking bribes.267 Experienced governors had been replaced by friends and relatives of the imperial family. Lucius Dasumius Tullius Tuscus a distant relative of Hadrian was in Upper Pannonia succeeding the experienced Marcus Nonius Macrinus. Lower Pannonia was under the obscure Tiberius Haterius Saturnius. Marcus Servilius Fabianus Maximus was shuffled from Lower Moesia to Upper Moesia when Marcus Iallius Bassus had joined Lucius in Antioch. Lower Moesia was filled by Pontius Laelianuss son. The Dacias were still divided in three governed by a praetorian senator and two procurators. The peace could not hold long Lower Pannonia did not even have a legion.268 Starting in the 1
60 s Germanic tribes and other nomadic people launched raids along the northern border particularly into Gaul and across the Danube. This new impetus westwards was probably due to attacks from tribes further east. A first invasion by the Chatti in the province of Germania Superior was repulsed in 1
62.2 69 Bronze medallion of Marcus Aurelius AD 168. The reverse depicts Jupiter flanked by Marcus and Lucius Verus. Inscription M. ANTONINVS AVG. ARM. PARTH. MAX.  TR. P. XXII IMP. IIII COS III.270 Aureus of Marcus Aurelius AD 176177. The pile of trophies on the reverse celebrates the end of the Marcomannic Wars. Inscription M. ANTONINVS AVG. GERM. SARM.  TR. P. XXXI IMP. VIII CONS. III P. P.271 Far more dangerous was the invasion of 166 when the Marcomanni of Bohemia clients of the Roman Empire since AD 19 crossed the Danube together with the Lombards and other Germanic tribes.272 Soon thereafter the Iranian Sarmatian Iazyges attacked between the Danube and the Theiss rivers.273 The Costoboci coming from the Carpathian area invaded Moesia Macedonia and Greece. After a long struggle Marcus managed to push back the invaders. Numerous members of Germanic tribes settled in frontier regions like Dacia Pannonia Germany and Italy itself. This was not a new thing but this time the numbers of settlers required the creation of two new frontier provinces on the left shore of the Danube Sarmatia and Marcomannia including todays Czech Republic Slovakia and Hungary. Some Germanic tribes who settled in Ravenna revolted and managed to seize possession of the city. For this reason Marcus decided not only against bringing more barbarians into Italy but even banished those who had previously been brought there.274 Legal and administrative workedit Like many emperors Marcus spent most of his time addressing matters of law such as petitions and hearing disputes275 but unlike many of his predecessors he was already proficient in imperial administration when he assumed power.276 He took great care in the theory and practice of legislation. Professional jurists called him an emperor most skilled in the law277 and a most prudent and conscientiously just emperor.278 He showed marked interest in three areas of the law the manumission of slaves the guardianship of orphans and minors and the choice of city councillors decuriones.279 Marcus showed a great deal of respect to the Roman Senate and routinely asked them for permission to spend money even though he did not need to do so as the absolute ruler of the Empire.280 In one speech Marcus himself reminded the Senate that the imperial palace where he lived was not truly his possession but theirs.281 In 168 he revalued the denarius increasing the silver purity from 79 to 82  the actual silver weight increasing from 
2.5 
72.6 7 g 
0.0 9
10.0 94 oz. However two years later he reverted to the previous values because of the military crises facing the empire.169 Trade with Han China and outbreak of plagueedit Main articles SinoRoman relations and Antonine Plague A possible contact with Han China occurred in 166 when a Roman traveller visited the Han court claiming to be an ambassador representing a certain Andun Chinese   ruler of Daqin who can be identified either with Marcus or his predecessor Antoninus.282283284 In addition to Republicanera Roman glasswares found at Guangzhou along the South China Sea285 Roman golden medallions made during the reign of Antoninus and perhaps even Marcus have been found at c Eo Vietnam then part of the Kingdom of Funan near the Chinese province of Jiaozhi in northern Vietnam. This may have been the port city of Kattigara described by Ptolemy c. 150 as being visited by a Greek sailor named Alexander and lying beyond the Golden Chersonese i.e. Malay Peninsula.2
86 note 17 Roman coins from the reigns of Tiberius to Aurelian have been found in Xian China site of the Han capital Changan although the far greater amount of Roman coins in India suggests the Roman maritime trade for purchasing Chinese silk was centred there not in China or even the overland Silk Road running through Persia.287 The Antonine Plague started in Mesopotamia in 165 or 166 at the end of Luciuss campaign against the Parthians. It may have continued into the reign of Commodus. Galen who was in Rome when the plague spread to the city in 166288 mentioned that fever diarrhoea and inflammation of the pharynx along with dry or pustular eruptions of the skin after nine days were among the symptoms.289 It is believed that the plague was smallpox.288 In the view of historian Rafe de Crespigny the plagues afflicting the Eastern Han empire of China during the reigns of Emperor Huan of Han r. 146168 and Emperor Ling of Han r. 168189 which struck in 151 161 171 173 179 182 and 185 were perhaps connected to the plague in Rome.290 Raoul McLaughlin writes that the travel of Roman subjects to the Han Chinese court in 166 may have started a new era of RomanFar East trade. However it was also a harbinger of something much more ominous. According to McLaughlin the disease caused irreparable damage to the Roman maritime trade in the Indian Ocean as proven by the archaeological record spanning from Egypt to India as well as significantly decreased Roman commercial activity in Southeast Asia.291 Death and succession 1
80 edit Last Words of the Emperor Marcus Aurelius 1844 by Eugne Delacroix Marcus Aurelius died at the age of 58 on 17 March 180292 of unknown causes in his military quarters either in the city of Vindobona province of Pannonia Superior today Vienna or near Sirmium province of Pannonia Inferior modern Sremska Mitrovica.note 18 He was immediately deified and his ashes were returned to Rome where they rested in Hadrians mausoleum modern Castel SantAngelo until the Visigoth sack of the city in 410. His campaigns against Germans and Sarmatians were also commemorated by a column and a temple built in Rome.293 Some scholars consider his death to be the end of the Pax Romana.294 The Roman Empire at the death of Marcus Aurelius in 180 represented in purple. His annexation of lands of the Marcomanni and the Jazyges  perhaps to be provincially called Marcomannia and Sarmatia295  was cut short in 175 by the revolt of Avidius Cassius and by his death.296 The light pink territory represents Roman dependencies Armenia Colchis Iberia and Albania. Marcus was succeeded by his son Commodus whom he had named Caesar in 166 and with whom he had jointly ruled since 1
77.2 97 Biological sons of the emperor if there were any were considered heirs298 however it was only the second time that a nonadoptive son had succeeded his father the only other having been a century earlier when Vespasian was succeeded by his son Titus. Historians have criticized the succession to Commodus citing Commoduss erratic behaviour and lack of political and military acumen.297 At the end of his history of Marcuss reign Cassius Dio wrote an encomium to the emperor and described the transition to Commodus in his own lifetime with sorrow299 Marcus did not meet with the good fortune that he deserved for he was not strong in body and was involved in a multitude of troubles throughout practically his entire reign. But for my part I admire him all the more for this very reason that amid unusual and extraordinary difficulties he both survived himself and preserved the empire. Just one thing prevented him from being completely happy namely that after rearing and educating his son in the best possible way he was vastly disappointed in him. This matter must be our next topic for our history now descends from a kingdom of gold to one of iron and rust as affairs did for the Romans of that day. Dio lxxi. 
36.3 4299 Dio adds that from Marcuss first days as counsellor to Antoninus to his final days as emperor of Rome he remained the same person and did not change in the least.300 Michael Grant in The Climax of Rome writes of Commodus301 The youth turned out to be very erratic or at least so antitraditional that disaster was inevitable. But whether or not Marcus ought to have known this to be so the rejections of his sons claims in favour of someone else would almost certainly have involved one of the civil wars which were to proliferate so disastrously around future successions.301 Attitude towards Christiansedit In the first two centuries of the Christian era local Roman officials were largely responsible for the persecution of Christians. In the second century the emperors treated Christianity as a local problem to be dealt with by their subordinates.302 The number and severity of persecutions of Christians in various locations of the empire seemingly increased during the reign of Marcus Aurelius. The extent to which the emperor himself directed encouraged or was aware of these persecutions is unclear and much debated by historians.303 The early Christian apologist Justin Martyr includes within his First Apology written between 140 and 150 a letter from Marcus Aurelius to the Roman Senate prior to his reign describing a battlefield incident in which Marcus believed Christian prayer had saved his army from thirst when water poured from heaven after which immediately we recognized the presence of God. Marcus goes on to request the Senate desist from earlier courses of Christian persecution by Rome.304 Marriage and issueedit This section may contain an excessive number of citations. Please help remove lowquality or irrelevant citations. June 2023 Learn how and when to remove this message Marcus and his wife Faustina had at least 14 children305 during their 
30 year marriage130306 including two sets of twins.130307 One son and four daughters outlived their father.308 Their children included Domitia Faustina 147151130142309 Titus Aelius Antoninus 149133307310 Titus Aelius Aurelius 149133307310 Annia Aurelia Galeria Lucilla 150136309182311 married her fathers coruler Lucius Verus142 then Tiberius Claudius Pompeianus had issue from both marriages Annia Galeria Aurelia Faustina born 151138 married Gnaeus Claudius Severus had a son Tiberius Aelius Antoninus born 152 died before 156138 Unknown child died before 158140 Annia Aurelia Fadilla born 159309140142 married Marcus Peducaeus Plautius Quintillus had issue Annia Cornificia Faustina Minor born 160309140142 married Marcus Petronius Sura Mamertinus had a son Titus Aurelius Fulvus Antoninus 161165 elder twin brother of Commodus310 Lucius Aurelius Commodus Antoninus Commodus 161192312 twin brother of Titus Aurelius Fulvus Antoninus later emperor310313 married Bruttia Crispina no issue Marcus Annius Verus Caesar 162169265306314142 Hadrianus142 Vibia Aurelia Sabina 170  died before 217310315142 married Lucius Antistius Burrus no issue NervaAntonine family treeedit v t e NervaAntonine family tree Q. Marcius Barea Soranus Q. Marcius Barea Sura Antonia Furnilla M. Cocceius Nerva Sergia Plautilla P. Aelius Hadrianus Titus r.7981 Marcia Furnilla Marcia Trajanus Pater Nerva r.9698 Ulpiai Aelius Hadrianus Marullinus Flaviaii Marcianaiii C. Salonius Matidiusiv Trajan r.98117 Plotina P. Acilius Attianus P. Aelius Aferv Paulina Majorvi Lucius Mindius 2 Libo Rupilius Frugi 3 Salonia Matidiavii L. Vibius Sabinus 
1 viii Paulina Minorvi L. Julius Ursus Servianusix Matidia Minorvii Sabinaiii Hadrianvxvi r.117138 Antinousxi C. Fuscus Salinator I Julia Serviana Paulina M. Annius Verusxii Rupilia Faustinaxiiixiv Boionia Procilla Cn. Arrius Antoninus L. Ceionius Commodus Appia Severa C. Fuscus Salinator II L. Caesennius Paetus Arria Antonina Arria Fadillaxv T. Aurelius Fulvus L. Caesennius Antoninus L. Commodus Plautia unknownxvi C. Avidius Nigrinus M. Annius Verusxiii Calvisia Domitia Lucillaxvii Fundaniaxviii M. Annius Liboxiii Faustinaxv Antoninus Pius r.1381
61 xv L. Aelius Caesarxvi Avidiaxvi Cornificiaxiii Marcus Aurelius r.1611
80 xix Faustina Minorxix C. Avidius Cassiusxx Aurelia Fadillaxv Lucius Verus r.1611
69 xvi 1 Ceionia Fabiaxvi Plautius Quintillusxxi Q. Servilius Pudens Ceionia Plautiaxvi Cornificia Minorxxii M. Petronius Sura Commodus r.1771
92 xix Fadillaxxii M. Annius Verus Caesarxix Ti. Claudius Pompeianus 2 Lucillaxix M. Plautius Quintillusxvi Junius Licinius Balbus Servilia Ceionia Petronius Antoninus L. Aurelius Agaclytus 2 Aurelia Sabinaxxii L. Antistius Burrus 1 Plautius Quintillus Plautia Servilla C. Furius Sabinus Timesitheus Antonia Gordiana Junius Licinius Balbus Furia Sabina Tranquillina Gordian III r.238244 1  
1 st spouse 2  
2 nd spouse 3  
3 rd spouse Reddishpurple indicates emperor of the NervaAntonine dynasty lighter purple indicates designated imperial heir of said dynasty who never reigned grey indicates unsuccessful imperial aspirants bluishpurple indicates emperors of other dynasties dashed lines indicate adoption dotted lines indicate love affairsunmarried relationships Small Caps  posthumously deified Augusti Augustae or other Notes Except where otherwise noted the notes below indicate that an individuals parentage is as shown in the above family tree.  Sister of Trajans father Giacosa 1977 p. 7.  Giacosa 1977 p. 8.  a b Levick 2014 p. 161.  Husband of Ulpia Marciana Levick 2014 p. 161.  a b Giacosa 1977 p. 7.  a b c DIR contributor Herbert W. Benario 2000 Hadrian.  a b Giacosa 1977 p. 9.  Husband of Salonia Matidia Levick 2014 p. 161.  Smith 1870 Julius Servianus.  Smith 1870 Hadrian pp. 319322.  Lover of Hadrian Lambert 1984 p. 99 and passim deification Lamber 1984 pp. 25 etc.  Husband of Rupilia Faustina Levick 2014 p. 163.  a b c d Levick 2014 p. 163.  It is uncertain whether Rupilia Faustina was Frugis daughter by Salonia Matidia or another woman.  a b c d Levick 2014 p. 162.  a b c d e f g Levick 2014 p. 164.  Wife of M. Annius Verus Giacosa 1977 p. 10.  Wife of M. Annius Libo Levick 2014 p. 163.  a b c d e Giacosa 1977 p. 10.  The epitomator of Cassius Dio 
72.2 2 gives the story that Faustina the Elder promised to marry Avidius Cassius. This is also echoed in HA Marcus Aurelius 24.  Husband of Ceionia Fabia Levick 2014 p. 164.  a b c Levick 2014 p. 117. References DIR contributors 2000. De Imperatoribus Romanis An Online Encyclopedia of Roman Rulers and Their Families. Retrieved 14 April 2015. Giacosa Giorgio 1977. Women of the Caesars Their Lives and Portraits on Coins. Translated by R. Ross Holloway. Milan Edizioni Arte e Moneta. ISBN 0839001932. Lambert Royston 1984. Beloved and God The Story of Hadrian and Antinous. New York Viking. ISBN 0670157082. Levick Barbara 2014. Faustina I and II Imperial Women of the Golden Age. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780195379419. Smith William ed. 1870. Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology. Writings and legacyedit Main article Meditations First page of the 1811 English translation by Richard Graves While on campaign between 170 and 180 Marcus wrote his Meditations in Greek as a source for his own guidance and selfimprovement. The original title of this work if it had one is unknown. Meditations  as well as other titles including To Himself  were adopted later. He had a logical mind and his notes were representative of Stoic philosophy and spirituality. Meditations is still revered as a literary monument to a government of service and duty. George Longs English translation of Meditations was included in Volume 2 of the Harvard Classics. According to Hays the book was a favourite of Christina of Sweden Frederick the Great John Stuart Mill Matthew Arnold and Goethe and is admired by modern figures such as Wen Jiabao and Bill Clinton.316 It has been considered by many commentators to be one of the greatest works of philosophy.317 Meditations sold 16000 copies in 2012. In 2019 100000 copies were sold. 318 It is not known how widely Marcuss writings were circulated after his death. There are stray references in the ancient literature to the popularity of his precepts and Julian the Apostate was well aware of his reputation as a philosopher though he does not specifically mention Meditations.319 It survived in the scholarly traditions of the Eastern Church and the first surviving quotes of the book as well as the first known reference of it by name Marcuss writings to himself are from Arethas of Caesarea in the 
10 th century and in the Byzantine Suda perhaps inserted by Arethas himself. It was first published in 1558 in Zurich by Wilhelm Xylander n Holzmann from a manuscript reportedly lost shortly afterwards.320 The oldest surviving complete manuscript copy is in the Vatican library and dates to the 
14 th century.321 A 
2 nd century Roman sculpted portrait of Marcus Aurelius which captures the pensive temperament of the philosopheremperor now in the Walters Art Museum. Marcus acquired the reputation of a philosopher king within his lifetime and the title would remain after his death both Dio and the biographer call him the philosopher.322323 Christians such as Justin Martyr Athenagoras and Eusebius also gave him the title.324 The latter went so far as to call him more philanthropic and philosophic than Antoninus and Hadrian and set him against the persecuting emperors Domitian and Nero to make the contrast bolder.325 The historian Herodian wrote Alone of the emperors he gave proof of his learning not by mere words or knowledge of philosophical doctrines but by his blameless character and temperate way of life.326 Iain King explains that Marcuss legacy was tragic The emperors Stoic philosophy  which is about selfrestraint duty and respect for others  was so abjectly abandoned by the imperial line he anointed on his death.327 Main article Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius Aureus of Marcus Aurelius AD December 173  June 174 with his equestrian statue on the reverse. inscription M. ANTONINVS AVG. TR. P. XXVIII  IMP. VI CONS III.328 The original Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius 
2 nd century AD now located in the Palazzo dei Conservatori The Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius in Rome is the only Roman equestrian statue which has survived into the modern period.329 Crafted of bronze in c.175 it stands 
11.6  ft 
3.5  m and is now located in the Capitoline Museums of Rome. The emperors hand is outstretched in an act of clemency offered to a bested enemy while his weary facial expression due to the stress of leading Rome into nearly constant battles perhaps represents a break with the classical tradition of sculpture.330 Main article Column of Marcus Aurelius Marcuss victory column established in Rome either in his last few years of life or after his reign and completed in 193 was built to commemorate his victory over the Sarmatians and Germanic tribes in 176. A spiral of carved reliefs wraps around the column showing scenes from his military campaigns. A statue of Marcus had stood atop the column but disappeared during the Middle Ages. It was replaced with a statue of Saint Paul in 1589 by Pope Sixtus V.331 The column of Marcus and the column of Trajan are often compared by scholars given how they are both Doric in style had a pedestal at the base had sculpted friezes depicting their respective military victories and a statue on top.332 See alsoedit List of Roman emperors Notesedit  Dio asserts that the Annii were nearkin of Hadrian and that it was to these familial ties that they owed their rise to power.27 The precise nature of these kinship ties is nowhere stated but is believed that Rupilia Faustina was the daughter of the consular senator Libo Rupilius Frugi and Vitellia daughter of emperor Vitellius.282930  Farquharson dates his death to 130 when Marcus was nine.40  Birley amends the text of the HA Marcus from Eutychius to Tuticius.53  Commodus was a known consumptive at the time of his adoption so Hadrian may have intended Marcuss eventual succession anyway.62  The manuscript is corrupt here.85  Modern scholars have not offered as positive an assessment. His second modern editor Niebhur thought him stupid and frivolous his third editor Naber found him contemptible.102 Historians have seen him as a pedant and a bore his letters offering neither the running political analysis of a Cicero or the conscientious reportage of a Pliny.103 Recent prosopographic research has rehabilitated his reputation though not by much.104  Champlin notes that Marcuss praise of Rusticus in the Meditations is out of order he is praised immediately after Diognetus who had introduced Marcus to philosophy giving him special emphasis.124  Although part of the biographers account of Lucius is fictionalized probably to mimic Nero whose birthday Lucius shared144 and another part poorly compiled from a better biographical source145 scholars have accepted these biographical details as accurate.146  These nameswaps have proven so confusing that even the Historia Augusta our main source for the period cannot keep them straight.161 The 
4 thcentury ecclesiastical historian Eusebius of Caesarea shows even more confusion.162 The mistaken belief that Lucius had the name Verus before becoming emperor has proven especially popular.163  There was however much precedent. The consulate was a twin magistracy and earlier emperors had often had a subordinate lieutenant with many imperial offices under Antoninus the lieutenant had been Marcus. Many emperors had planned a joint succession in the past Augustus planned to leave Gaius and Lucius Caesar as joint emperors on his death Tiberius wished to have Gaius Caligula and Tiberius Gemellus do so as well Claudius left the empire to Nero and Britannicus imagining that they would accept equal rank. All of these arrangements had ended in failure either through premature death Gaius and Lucius Caesar or judicial murder Gemellus by Caligula and Britannicus by Nero.163  The biographer relates the scurrilous and in the judgment of Anthony Birley untrue rumor that Commodus was an illegitimate child born of a union between Faustina and a gladiator.176  Because both Lucius and Marcus are said to have taken active part in the recovery HA Marcus viii. 45 the flood must have happened before Luciuss departure for the east in 162 because it appears in the biographers narrative after Antoninuss funeral has finished and the emperors have settled into their offices it must not have occurred in the spring of 161. A date in autumn 161 or spring 162 is probable and given the normal seasonal distribution of Tiber flooding the most probable date is in spring 1
62.1 92 Birley dates the flood to autumn 1
61.1 87  Since AD 15 the river had been administered by a Tiber Conservancy Board with a consular senator at its head and a permanent staff. In 161 the curator alevi Tiberis et riparum et cloacarum urbis Curator of the Tiber Bed and Banks and the City Sewers was A. Platorius Nepos son or grandson of the builder of Hadrians Wall whose name he shares. He probably had not been particularly incompetent. A more likely candidate for that incompetence is Neposs likely predecessor M. Statius Priscus. A military man and consul for 159 Priscus probably looked on the office as little more than paid leave.194  Alan Cameron adduces the 
5 thcentury writer Sidonius Apollinariss comment that Marcus commanded countless legions vivente Pio while Antoninus was alive while contesting Birleys contention that Marcus had no military experience. Neither Apollinaris nor the Historia Augusta Birleys source are particularly reliable on 
2 ndcentury history.209  Birley believes there is some truth in these considerations.231  The whole section of the vita dealing with Luciuss debaucheries HA Verus iv. 
46.6  however is an insertion into a narrative otherwise entirely cribbed from an earlier source. Most of the details are fabricated by the biographer himself relying on nothing better than his own imagination.237  For further information on c Eo see Osborne Milton. The Mekong Turbulent Past Uncertain Future. Crows Nest Allen  Unwin 2006 revised edition first published in 2000. pp. 2425. ISBN 9781741148930.  Vindobona as Marc Aurels death place is mentioned by Aurelius Victor in his De Caesaribus 
16.1 4 Sirmium on the other hand in Tertullians Apologeticum 25 Citationsedit All citations to the Historia Augusta are to individual biographies and are marked with a HA. Citations to the works of Fronto are crossreferenced to C.R. Hainess Loeb edition.  Henry Albert Fischel Rabbinic Literature and GrecoRoman Philosophy A Study of Epicurea and Rhetorica in Early Midrashic Writings E. J. Brill 1973 p. 95.  Marcus Aurelius Archived 28 December 2018 at the Wayback Machine. Dictionary.com.  Keresztes Paul July 1968. Marcus Aurelius a Persecutor. Harvard Theological Review. 61 3 321341. doi
10.1 0
17 S0017816000029230. ISSN 14754517. S
2 CID 159950967.  Rohrbacher p. 5.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 229230. The thesis of single authorship was first proposed in H. Dessaus ber Zeit und Persnlichkeit der Scriptores Historiae Augustae in German Hermes 24 1889 pp. 3
37 ff.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 230. On the HA Verus see Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus pp. 6574.  Fleury P. 2012. Marcus Aurelius Letters. In A Companion to Marcus Aurelius. Edited by M. van Ackeren 6276. Oxford and Malden MA Blackwell.  Freisenbruch A. 2007. Back to Fronto Doctor and Patient in His Correspondence with an Emperor. In Ancient Letters Classical and Late Antique Epistolography. Edited by R. Morello and A. D. Morrison 235256. Oxford Oxford Univ. Press.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 227.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 228229 253.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 227228.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 228.  Magill p. 693.  a b Cassius Dio Book 69
21.1 . Marcus Annius Verus ... This Marcus Annius earlier named Catilius was a grandson of Annius Verus ... He preferred Verus on account of his kinship and his age and because he was already giving indication of exceptional strength of character. This led Hadrian to apply to the young man the name Verissimus thus playing upon the meaning of the Latin word.  a b Historia Augusta Marcus Antoninus I.910. At the beginning of his life Marcus Antoninus was named Catilius Severus after his mothers grandfather. After the death of his real father however Hadrian called him Annius Verissimus and after he assumed the toga virilis Annius Verus.  Van Ackeren p. 139.  a b c Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 33.  McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 24.  Van Ackeren p. 78.  Dean p. 32.  Knight Charles 1856. The English Cyclopdia A New Dictionary of Universal Knowledge. Biography. Bradbury  Evans. p. 439. Marcus Aurelius Malennius and Numa.  Snchez p. 165.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 29 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 14.  HA Marcus i. 2 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 28 McLynn Marcus Aurelius A Life p. 14.  Giacosa p. 8.  Levick pp. 161 163.  Dio 
69.2 
1.2  
71.3 
5.2 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 31.  Rupilius. Strachan stemma.  Settipani Christian 2000. Continuit gentilice et continuit familiale dans les familles snatoriales romaines  lpoque impriale mythe et ralit. Prosopographica et genealogica in Italian. Vol. 2 illustrated ed.. Unit for Prosopographical Research Linacre College University of Oxford. p. 278. ISBN 9781900934022.  Codex Inscriptionum Latinarum 
14.3 579 EpigraphikDatenbank ClaussSlaby. Archived from the original on 29 April 2012. Retrieved 15 November 2011. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 29 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor pp. 14 575 n. 53 citing Ronald Syme Roman Papers 
1.2 44.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 29 citing Pliny Epistulae 
8.1 8.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 30.  M. Cornelius Fronto Epistulae.  l. Richardson jr Richardson Professor of Latin Emeritus L. October 1992. A New Topographical Dictionary of Ancient Rome. JHU Press. p. 198. ISBN 9780801843006. horti domizia lucilla.  Ad Marcum Caesarem ii. 
8.2   Haines 
1.1 42 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 31.  Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology vol. I p. 436 Aurelia Gens.  Bury p. 523.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 31 44.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 31.  Farquharson 
1.9 596.  Meditations 
1.1  qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 31.  HA Marcus ii. 1 and Meditations v. 4 qtd. in Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 32.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 3132.  Meditations i. 1 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 35.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 35.  Meditations i. 
17.2  Farquharson 
1.1 02 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 23 cf. Meditations i. 
17.1 1 Farquharson 
1.1 03.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 49.  McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor 2021.  Meditations 
1.4  McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 20.  HA Marcus ii. 2 iv. 9 Meditations i. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 37 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor pp. 2122.  HA Marcus ii. 6 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 38 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 21.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 40 citing Aristides Oratio 32 K McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 21.  Magie  Birley Lives of the later Caesars pp. 109 109 n.8 Marcus Aurelius pp. 40 270 n.27 citing Bonner HistoriaAugusta Colloquia 19667 pp. 
39 ff.  HA Marcus ii. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 40 270 n.27.  Meditations i. 10 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 40 McLynn Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor p. 22.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 40 270 n.28 citing A.S.L. Farquharson The Meditations of Marcus Antoninus Oxford 1944 ii. 453.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 4142.  HA Hadrian xiii. 10 qtd. in Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 42.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 42. Van Ackeren 142. On the succession to Hadrian see also T.D. Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus Journal of Roman Studies 5712 1967 6579 J. VanderLeest Hadrian Lucius Verus and the Arco di Portogallo Phoenix 494 1995 pp. 319330.  HA Aelius vi. 23  HA Hadrian xxiii. 1516 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 45 Hadrian to the Antonines 148.  Dio lxix.
17.1  HA Aelius iii. 7 iv. 6 vi. 17 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 147.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 46. Date Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 148.  Weigel Richard D. Antoninus Pius A.D. 138161. Roman Emperors.  Dio 
69.2 
1.1  HA Hadrian xxiv. 1 HA Aelius vi. 9 HA Antoninus Pius iv. 67 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 4849.  HA Marcus v. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 49.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 4950.  HA Marcus v. 68 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 50.  Dio 
69.2 
2.4  HA Hadrian xxv. 56 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 5051. Hadrians suicide attempts Dio lxix. 
22.1 4 HA Hadrian xxiv. 813.  HA Hadrian xxv. 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 53.  HA Antoninus Pius v. 3 vi. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 5556 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 151.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 55 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 151.  Mattingly  Sydenham Roman imperial coinage vol. III p. 108.  Mattingly  Sydenham Roman imperial coinage vol. III p. 77.  HA Marcus vi. 2 Verus ii. 34 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 5354.  Dio 
71.3 
5.5  HA Marcus vi. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 56.  Meditations vi. 30 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 57 cf. Marcus Aurelius p. 270 n.9 with notes on the translation.  a b HA Marcus vi. 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius 57.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 57 272 n.10 citing Codex Inscriptionum Latinarum 
6.3 2 
6.3 79 cf. Inscriptiones Latinae Selectae 360.  Meditations 
5.1 6 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 57.  Meditations 
8.9  qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 57.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 5758.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 7 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 90.  HA Marcus vi. 5 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 58.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 89.  Ad Marcum Caesarem v. 1 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 89.  Ad Marcum Caesarem 
4.8  qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 89.  Dio 
71.3 
6.3  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 89.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 9091.  HA Antoninus Pius x. 2 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 91.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 91.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 61.  HA Marcus iii. 6 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 62.  HA Marcus ii. 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 62.  Alan Cameron review of Anthony Birleys Marcus Aurelius Classical Review 173 1967 p. 347.  Vita Sophistae 

2.1.1 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 6364.  Aulus Gellius Noctes Atticae 

9.2.1 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 6465.  Aulus Gellius Noctes Atticae 
19.1 2 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 65.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 65.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 6768 citing Champlin Fronto and Antonine Rome esp. chs. 3 and 4.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 6567.  Champlin Fronto pp. 12.  Mellor p. 460.  Cf. e.g. Mellor p. 461 and passim.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 69.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 6  Haines 
1.8 
0 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 76.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 6  Haines 
1.8 
0 ff Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 7677.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iii. 1011  Haines 
1.5 
0 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 73.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 73.  Champlin Chronology of Fronto p. 138.  Ad Marcum Caesarem v. 74  Haines 
2.5 
2 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 73.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 77. On the date see Champlin Chronology of Fronto p. 142 who with Bowersock Greek Sophists in the Roman Empire 1964 
93 ff argues for a date in the 1
50 s Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 7879 273 n.17 with Ameling Herodes Atticus 1983 
1.6 
1 ff 
2.3 
0 ff argues for 140.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iii. 2  Haines 
1.5 
8 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 7778.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iii. 3  Haines 
1.6 
2 ff Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 78.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iii. 3  Haines 
1.6 
2 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 79.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 80.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 13  Haines 
1.2 
14 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 93.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 
3.1   Haines 
1.2 ff Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 94.  HA Marcus iii. 58 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 94.  Ad Marcum Caesarem iv. 3 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 69.  De Eloquentia iv. 5  Haines 
2.7 4 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 95. Alan Cameron in his review of Birleys biography The Classical Review 173 1967 p. 347 suggests a reference to chapter 11 of Arthur Darby Nocks Conversion Oxford Oxford University Press 1933 rept. 1961 Conversion to Philosophy.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 94 105.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 95 Champlin Fronto p. 120.  Champlin Fronto p. 174 n. 12.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem i.
2.2   Haines 
2.3 6 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 95.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 9495 101.  Champlin Fronto p. 120.  Meditations i.7 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 9495.  Philostratus Vitae sophistorum ii. 9 557 cf. Suda Markos  a b c d Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 103.  Ad Marcum Caesarem 
4.1 1  Haines 
1.2 
02 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 105.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 247 F.1.  a b c Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 206207.  Meditations ix.40 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 207.  a b Meditations x.34 tr. Farquharson pp. 78 224.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 107.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 107108.  a b c Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 108.  Inscriptiones Graecae ad Res Romanas pertinentes 
4.1 399 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 114.  a b c d e Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 114.  Reed p. 194.  a b c d e f g h Lendering Jona. Marcus Aurelius Archived 25 November 2005 at the Wayback Machine. Livius.org.  HA Verus 
2.9 11 
3.4 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 108.  Suetonius Nero 
6.1  HA Verus 
1.8  Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus 67 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 158. See also Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus pp. 6970 Pierre Lambrechts Lempereur Lucius Verus. Essai de rhabilitation in French Antiquit Classique 3 1934 pp. 1
73 ff.  Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus p. 66. Poorly compiled e.g. Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus p. 68.  Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus pp. 6869.  HA Verus 
2.9 11 
3.4 7 Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus 68 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 108.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 112.  Bowman 156 Victor 157  Victor 157  Dio 
71.3 
3.4 5 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 114.  Bury p. 532.  HA Antoninus Pius 
12.4 8 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 114.  Bowman p. 156.  HA Marcus vii. 5 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 116.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 116. Birley takes the phrase horror imperii from HA Pert. xiii. 1 and xv. 8.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 156.  HA Verus iii.8 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 116 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 156.  HA Verus iv.1 Marcus vii.5 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 116.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 116117.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 117 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 157 n.53.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 157 n.53.  a b c d Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 117.  Christer Bruun J. C. Edmondson 2015. The Oxford Handbook of Roman Epigraphy. Oxford University Press. p. 191. ISBN 9780195336467.  HA Verus iv.2 tr. Magie cited in Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 117 278 n.4.  HA Marcus vii. 9 Verus iv.3 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 117118.  HA Marcus vii. 9 Verus iv.3 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 117118. twice the size DuncanJones p. 109.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 118.  a b Roman Currency of the Principate. Tulane.edu. Archived 10 February 2001.  HA Marcus vii. 10 tr. Magie cited in Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 118 278 n.6.  HA Marcus vii. 1011 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 118.  HA Antoninus Pius xii.8 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 118119.  HA Marcus vii. 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119.  HA Comm. i.3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119.  HA Comm. i.2 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119.  HA Marcus xix. 12 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 278 n.9.  HA Commodus. i.4 x.2 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 1
55 ff. 9
49 ff.  HA Marcus vii. 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 118.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 118 citing Werner Eck Die Organization Italiens 1979 pp. 1
46 ff.  HA Marcus viii. 1 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 157.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 122123 citing H.G. Pfalum Les carrires procuratoriennes questres sous le HautEmpire romain IIII Paris 196061 Supplment Paris 1982 nos. 142 156 Eric Birley Roman Britain and the Roman Army 1953 pp. 1
42 ff. 1
51 ff.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123 citing H.G. Pfalum Les carrires procuratoriennes questres sous le HautEmpire romain IIII Paris 196061 Supplment Paris 1982 no. 141.  HA Marcus viii. 8 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123 citing W. Eck Die Satthalter der germ. Provinzen 1985 pp. 
65 ff.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120 citing Ad Verum Imperatorem i.
3.2   Haines 
1.2 
98 ff.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem iv.
2.3   Haines 
1.3 
02 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 119.  a b Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120 citing Ad Verum Imperatorem i.1  Haines 
1.3 05.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem iv.1  Haines 
1.3 
00 ff qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120.  HA Marcus viii. 34 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 841 845.  Gregory S. Aldrete Floods of the Tiber in ancient Rome Baltimore Johns Hopkins University Press 2007 pp. 3031.  HA Marcus viii. 45 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 120.  Inscriptiones Latinae Selectae 5932 Nepos 1092 Priscus Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 121.  HA Marcus xi. 3 cited in Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 278 n.16.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem 

1.2.2   Haines 
2.3 5 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 128.  De eloquentia 
1.1 2  Haines 
2.6 365 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 128.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem 

1.2.2   Haines 
2.3 5 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 127128.  Ad Antoninum Imperatorem 

1.2.4   Haines 
2.4 143 tr. Haines Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 128.  HA Antoninus Pius xii.7 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 114 121.  Event HA Marcus viii. 6 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 121. Date JaapJan Flinterman The Date of Lucians Visit to Abonuteichos Zeitschrift fr Papyrologie und Epigraphik 119 1997 p. 281.  HA Marcus viii. 6 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 121.  Lucian Alexander 27 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 121.  Lucian Alexander 27 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 121122. On Alexander see Robin Lane Fox Pagans and Christians Harmondsworth Penguin 1986 pp. 241250.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 278 n.19.  Dio 

71.2.1  Lucian Historia Quomodo Conscribenda 21 24 25 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 121122.  HA Marcus viii. 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 122.  HA Antoninus Pius vii.11 Marcus vii.2 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 103104 122.  Pan. Ath. 203204 qtd. and tr. Alan Cameron review of Anthony Birleys Marcus Aurelius The Classical Review 173 1967 p. 349.  HA Marcus viii. 6 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  Corpus Inscriptionum Latinarum 
8.7 05051 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  Incriptiones Latinae Selectae 109798 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  Incriptiones Latinae Selectae 1091 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  Incriptiones Latinae Selectae 2311 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  HA Marcus xii. 13 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  LAnne pigraphique 19
72.6 57 EpigraphikDatenbank ClaussSlaby. Archived from the original on 29 April 2012. Retrieved 15 November 2011. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 125.  HA Verus 
9.2  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 125.  Mattingly  Sydenham Roman imperial coinage vol. III p. 226.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 1  Haines 
2.3  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 126.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 
3.1   Haines 
2.5  qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 126.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 
3.4   Haines 
2.9  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 126127.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 
3.6 12  Haines 
2.1 119 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 126127.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 4 tr. Haines 
2.1 9 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 127.  De Feriis Alsiensibus 4  Haines 
2.1 9 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 127.  Ad Verum Imperatorem 

2.1.1 9  Haines 
2.1 49 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129.  De bello Parthico x.  Haines 
2.3 1 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 127.  De bello Parthico iii.  Haines 
2.2 123.  De bello Parthico i.  Haines 
2.2 1 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 127.  Dio lxxi. 
1.3  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 123.  HA Verus v. 8 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 123 125.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 125.  HA Marcus viii. 9 tr. Magie Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 123126. On Luciuss voyage see HA Verus vi. 79 HA Marcus viii. 1011 Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 125126.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129.  HA Verus iv.4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129.  HA Verus iv. 6 tr. Magie cf. v. 7 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129.  HA Verus viii. 7 viii. 1011 Fronto Principia Historiae 17  Haines 
2.2 17 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129.  Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus. p. 69.  HA Verus ix. 2 Corpus Inscriptionum Latinarum 
3.1 99 EpigraphikDatenbank ClaussSlaby. Archived from the original on 29 April 2012. Retrieved 15 November 2011. Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 130131.  HA Verus vii. 7 Marcus ix. 4 Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus p. 72 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163 cf. also Barnes Legislation against the Christians p. 39 Some Persons in the Historia Augusta p. 142 citing the Vita Abercii 
44 ff.  HA Verus 
7.1 0 Lucian Imagines 3 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131. Cf. Lucian Imagines Pro Imaginibus passim.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163.  HA Verus vii. 7 Marcus ix. 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131.  Birley Marcus Aurelius 131 citing Anne pigraphique 19
58.1 5.  HA Verus 
7.7  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131.  HA Marcus ix. 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131.  HA Marcus ix. 56 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131.  HA Marcus ix. 1 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162.  HA Marcus ix. 1 HA Verus vii. 12 Ad Verum Imperatorem 
2.3   Haines 
2.1 33 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 129 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 2
33 ff.  Dio lxxi.
3.1  Birley Marcus Aurelius 131 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162 Millar Near East p. 113.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 280 n. 42 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 131 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 2
61 ff. 300 ff.  Birley Marcus Aurelius pp. 130 279 n. 38 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163 citing Prosopographia Imperii Romani2 M 169 Millar Near East p. 112.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 130 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162.  Fronto Ad Verum Imperatorem ii.
1.3   Haines 
2.1 33 Astarita 41 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 130 Hadrian to the Antonines p. 162.  Inscriptiones Latinae Selectae 1098 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 130.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163 citing Prosopographia Imperii Romani2 M 169.  Lucian Historia Quomodo Conscribenda 15 19 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163.  Lucian Historia Quomodo Conscribenda 20 28 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 163 citing Syme Roman Papers 
5.6 
89 ff.  HA Verus 
8.3 4 Birley Hadrian to the Antonines 163. Birley cites R.H. McDowell Coins from Seleucia on the Tigris Ann Arbor University of Michigan Press 1935 pp. 1
24 ff. on the date.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 164.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 164 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 384 ff. 1248 ff. 1271 ff.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 164 citing P. Kneissl Die Siegestitulatur der rmischen Kaiser. Untersuchungen zu den Siegerbeinamen des 1. und 2. Jahrhunderts Gttingen 1969 pp. 99 ff.  Birley Hadrian to the Antonines p. 164 citing H. Mattingly Coins of the Roman Empire in the British Museum IV Antoninus Pius to Commodus London 1940 Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus nos. 4
01 ff.  a b Adams p. 94.  Dio 
72.1 
1.3 4 Ad amicos 
1.1 2  Haines 
2.1 73 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 132.  Dio lxxii. 
11.3 4 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 132 citing De nepote amisso ii  Haines 
2.2 22 Ad Verum Imperatorem ii. 910  Haines 
2.2 
32 ff..  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 133 citing Geza Alfldy Konsulat und Senatorenstand 1977 Moesia Inferior pp. 2
32 ff. Moesia Superior pp. 2
34 ff. Pannonia Superior pp. 2
36 ff. Dacia pp. 2
45 ff. Pannonia Inferior p. 251.  McLynn Marcus Aurelius A Life pp. 323324.  Gnecchi Medaglioni Romani p. 33.  Mattingly  Sydenham Roman imperial coinage vol. III p. 241.  Le Bohec p. 56.  Grant The Antonines The Roman Empire in Transition p. 29.  Dio lxxii.
11.4 5 Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 253.  Fergus Millar The Emperor in the Roman World 31 BC  AD 337 London Duckworth 1977 6 and passim. See also idem. Emperors at Work Journal of Roman Studies 5712 1967 919.  Thinkers At War  Marcus Aurelius. Military History Monthly published 2014. This is the conclusion of Iain Kings biography of Marcus Aurelius. Pius one of longestserving emperors became infirm in his last years so Marcus Aurelius gradually assumed the imperial duties. By the time he succeeded in 161 he was already wellpractised in public administration.  Codex Justinianeus 

7.2.6  qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius 133.  Digest 
31.6 
7.1 0 qtd. and tr. Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 133.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 133.  Irvine pp. 5758.  Dio lxxii.33  Pulleyblank Leslie and Gardiner pp. 7179.  Y pp. 460461.  De Crespigny p. 600.  An 83.  Young pp. 2930.  Ball p. 154.  a b Haas pp. 10931098.  Murphy Verity. Past pandemics that ravaged Europe. BBC News 7 November 2005.  De Crespigny p. 514.  McLaughlin pp. 5960.  Dio 
72.3 3.  Kleiner p. 230.  Merrony p. 85.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 253.  Birley Marcus Aurelius p. 183.  a b Birley Hadrian to the Antonines pp. 186191.  Kemezis p. 45.  a b Tr. Cary ad loc.  Dio lxxii. 36 
72.3 4  a b Grant The Climax Of Rome p. 15.  Barnes Legislation against the Christians.  McLynn Marcus Aurelius A Life p. 295.  The First Apology of Justin Martyr Chapter LXVIII  van Ackeren Marcel 2012. A Companion to Marcus Aurelius. John Wiley  Sons. p. 229. ISBN 9781118219843.  a b Stephens p. 31.  a b c Lendering Jona. Antoninus and Aelius. Livius.org.  Ackermann Schroeder Terry Lo Upshur and Whitters p. 39.  a b c d McLynn Marcus Aurelius A Life p. 92.  a b c d e Levick p. 171.  Lendering Jona. Lucilla. Livius.org.  Gagarin p. 37.  Benario Herbert W. Marcus Aurelius A.D. 161180. Roman Emperors.  Adams p. 104.  Levick p. 160.  Hays p. xlix.  Collins p. 58.  Love Shayla 29 June 2021. The Revival of Stoicism. Vice. Retrieved 12 December 2023.  Stertz p. 434 citing Themistius Oratio 
6.8 1 HA Cassius 
3.5  Victor De Caesaribus 
16.9 .  Hays pp. xlviiixlix.  Hadot p. 22.  HA Marcus i. 1 xxvii. 7 Dio lxxi. 
1.1  James Francis Subversive Virtue Asceticism and Authority in the SecondCentury Pagan World University Park Pennsylvania State University Press 1995 21 n. 1.  Mark Joshua. Marcus Aurelius Platos Philosopher King. World History Encyclopedia. 8 May 2018.  Francis p. 21 n.1 citing Justin 1 Apologia 1 Athenagoras Leg. 1 Eusebius Historia Ecclesiastica 
4.2 
6.9 11.  Eusebius Historia Ecclesiastica 
4.2 
6.9 11 qtd. and tr. Francis 21 n. 1.  Herodian Ab Excessu Divi Marci i.
2.4  tr. Echols.  Thinkers at War.  Mattingly  Sydenham Roman imperial coinage vol. III p. 236.  Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius.  Kleiner p. 193.  Column of Marcus Aurelius Overall view of base and column Archived 22 May 2020 at the Wayback Machine. University of Notre Dame Hesburgh Library. Accessed 24 November 2018.  Scenes for Comparison  The Columns of Trajan and Marcus Aurelius  Classics. classics.sites.grinnell.edu. Retrieved 21 July 2021. Bibliographyedit Ancientedit Aristides Aelius. Orationes in Latin. Trapp Michael B. Orations. 1 Orationes 12. Cambridge Massachusetts Harvard University Press 2017. ISBN 9780674996465. Victor Aurelius. De Caesaribus in Latin. Bird H.W. De Caesaribus. Liverpool Liverpool University Press 1994. ISBN 9780853232186. Dio Cassius. Roman History in Greek. Cary Earnest trans. Roman History. 9 vols. Loeb ed. London Heinemann 191427. OCLC 500523615. Online at LacusCurtius. Digest in Latin. Scott S.P. trans. The Digest or Pandects in The Civil Law. 17 vols. Cincinnati Central Trust Company 1932. OCLC 23759480. Online at the Constitution Society. Epiphanius of Salamis. On Weights and Measures in Latin. Dean James Elmer ed. Epiphanius Treatise on Weights and Measures  The Syriac Version. Chicago University of Chicago Press 1935. OCLC 123314338. Fronto Marcus Cornelius. The Correspondence of Marcus Cornelius Fronto With Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Lucius Verus Antoninus Pius and Various Friends in Latin. Haines Charles Reginald trans. The Correspondence of Marcus Cornelius Fronto With Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Lucius Verus Antoninus Pius and Various Friends. 2 vols. Loeb ed. London Heinemann 1920. OCLC 476921438. Online at the Internet Archive Vol. 1 2. Gellius Aulus. Noctes Atticae Attic Nights. Rolfe J.C. trans. The Attic nights of Aulus Gellius. 3 vols. Loeb ed. London Heinemann 192728. OCLC 59229750 Vol. 1 OCLC 1072405870 Vol. 2 OCLC 1021363430 Vol. 3. Vols. 1 and 2 online at LacusCurtius. Herodian. Ab Excessu Divi Marci History of the Roman Empire from the Death of Marcus Aurelius in Latin. Echols Edward C. trans. Herodian of Antiochs History of the Roman empire From the death of Marcus Aurelius to the accession of Gordian III. Berkeley and Los Angeles University of California Press 1961. OCLC 463202486. Online at Tertullian and Livius. Lucian. Fowler F.G. Fowler H.W. trans. The works of Lucian of Samosata. Oxford Clarendon P. 1949. OCLC 503242210. Alexander in Latin. Translation online at Tertullian. Translations from Latin of Historia Quomodo Conscribenda The Way to Write History Imagines A PortraitStudy and Pro Imaginibus Defence of the PortraitStudy online at Sacred Texts based on the Gutenberg etext. Marcus Aurelius Antoninus. Meditations. Farquharson A.S.L. trans. Meditations. New York Knopf 1946 rept. 1992. OCLC 897495952. Scriptores Historiae Augustae Authors of the Historia Augusta. Historia Augusta Augustan History. Magie David trans. Historia Augusta. 3 vols. Loeb ed. London Heinemann 192132. Online at LacusCurtius. Magie David Birley Anthony R. Lives of the later Caesars. London The Folio Society 2005. ISBN 0141935995. Themistius. Orationes in Latin. Penella Robert J. The private orations of Themistius. Berkeley University of California Press 2000. ISBN 9780520218215. Modernedit Ackermann Marsha E. Schroeder Michael J. Terry Jancie J. Lo Upshur JiuHwa Whitters Mark F. Encyclopedia of World History AckermanSchroederTerryHwa Lo 2008 Encyclopedia of World Historypermanent dead link. New York Facts on File 2008. ISBN 9780816063864. Adams Geoff W. Marcus Aurelius in the Historia Augusta and Beyond. Lanham MD Lexington Books 2013. ISBN 9780739176382. An Jiayao. When Glass Was Treasured in China. Annette L. Juliano and Judith A. Lerner eds Nomads Traders and Holy Men Along Chinas Silk Road 7994. Turnhout Belgium Brepols Publishers 2002. ISBN 9782503521787. Astarita Maria L. Avidio Cassio in Italian. Rome Edizione di Storia e Letteratura 1983. OCLC 461867183. Ball Warwick. Rome in the East The Transformation of an Empire 
2 nd edition. London Routledge 2016. ISBN 9780415720786. Barnes Timothy D. Hadrian and Lucius Verus. Journal of Roman Studies 5712 1967 6579. doi
10.2 307299345. JSTOR 299345. Barnes Timothy D. Legislation against the Christians. Journal of Roman Studies Vol. 58 1968 3250. doi
10.2 307299693. JSTOR 299693. Barnes Timothy D. Some Persons in the Historia Augusta Phoenix 262 1972 140182. doi
10.2 3071087714. JSTOR 1087714. Birley Anthony R. Marcus Aurelius a biography. London Routledge 1966 rev. 1987. ISBN 9781134695690. Birley Anthony R. Hadrian to the Antonines. In The Cambridge Ancient History Volume 11 The High Empire AD 70192 edited by Alan Bowman Peter Garnsey and Dominic Rathbone 132194. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 2000. ISBN 9780521263351. Bowman John L. A Reference Guide to Stoicism. Bloomington IN Author House 2014. ISBN 9781496900173. Bury John Bagnell. The Students Roman Empire A History of the Roman Empire from Its Foundation to the Death of Marcus Aurelius 27 B.C.180 A.D.. New York Harper 1893. OCLC 1067064647. Champlin Edward. The Chronology of Fronto. Journal of Roman Studies 64 1974 136159. doi
10.2 307299265. JSTOR 299265. Champlin Edward. Fronto and Antonine Rome. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press 1980. ISBN 9780674331778. Collins Desmond. Background to Archaeology Britain in its European Setting. Cambridge Cambridge University Press Archive 1973. OCLC 879899744. De Crespigny Rafe. A Biographical Dictionary of Later Han to the Three Kingdoms 23220 AD. Boston Brill 2007. ISBN 9789047411840. DuncanJones Richard. Structure and Scale in the Roman Economy. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 1990. ISBN 9780521892896. Equestrian Statue of Marcus Aurelius. Musei Capitolini. Gagarin Michael. The Oxford encyclopedia of ancient Greece and Rome. Volume 7 Temples  Zoology. Oxford Oxford University Press 2010. ISBN 9780195170726. Giacosa Giorgio. Women of the Caesars their lives and portraits on coins. Translated from Italian by R. Ross Holloway. Milan Edizioni Arte e Moneta 1977. ISBN 0839001932. Gilliam J. F. The Plague under Marcus Aurelius. American Journal of Philology 
82.3  1961 225251. doi
10.2 307292367. JSTOR 292367. Gnecchi Francesco. I medaglioni Romani 3 Vols Milan 1912. OCLC 6529816. Grant Michael. The Antonines the Roman Empire in transition. London Routledge 2016. ISBN 9781317972105. Grant Michael. The Climax Of Rome. London Orion 2011. ISBN 9781780222769. Haas Charles. The Antonine plague in French. Bulletin de lAcadmie Nationale de Mdecine. Acadmie nationale de mdecine. 190 2006 10931098. OCLC 958470753. Hadot Pierre. The inner citadel the Meditations of Marcus Aurelius. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press 1998. ISBN 9780674461710. Hays Gregory. Meditations. London Weidenfeld  Nicolson 2003. ISBN 9781842126752. Holiday Ryan Hanselman Stephen 2020. Marcus Aurelius the Philosopher King. Lives of the Stoics. New York PortfolioPenguin. pp. 279299. ISBN 9780525541875. Irvine William B. A Guide to the Good Life The Ancient Art of Stoic Joy. Oxford University Press 2009. ISBN 9781522632733. Kemezis Adam M. Greek Narratives of the Roman Empire under the Severans Cassius Dio Philostratus and Herodian. Cambridge University Press 2014. ISBN 9781107062726. Kleiner Fred S. Gardners art through the ages. Volume II the western perspective. Mason OH Cengage Learning 2008. ISBN 9780495573555. Le Bohec Yann. The Imperial Roman Army. Routledge 2013. ISBN 9781135955137. Levick Barbara M. Faustina I and II Imperial Women of the Golden Age. New York Oxford University Press 2014. ISBN 9780199702176. Magill Frank N. Dictionary of World Biography. London Routledge 2003. ISBN 9781579580407. Mattingly Harold Sydenham Edward A. The Roman imperial coinage. Vol. III Antoninus Pius to Commodus. London Spink  Son 1930. OCLC 768929523. Mellor Ronald review of Edward Champlins Fronto and Antonine Rome American Journal of Philology 1034 1982. Merrony Mark. The Plight of Rome in the Fifth Century AD. London Routledge 2017. ISBN 9781351702782. McLaughlin Raoul. Rome and the Distant East Trade Routes to the Ancient Lands of Arabia India and China. London  New York Continuum 2010. ISBN 9781847252357. McLynn Frank. Marcus Aurelius A Life. New York Da Capo Press 2009. ISBN 9780306819162. McLynn Frank. Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor. London Bodley Head 2009. ISBN 9780224072922. Millar Fergus. The Roman Near East 31 B.C.A.D. 337. Cambridge MA Harvard University Press 1993. ISBN 9780674778863. Pulleyblank Edwin G. Leslie D. D. Gardiner K. H. J. The Roman Empire as Known to Han China. Journal of the American Oriental Society 1999. 119 1. doi
10.2 307605541. JSTOR 605541. Reed J. Eugene. The Lives of the Roman Emperors and Their Associates from Julius Csar B.C. 100 to Agustulus A.D. 476. Philadelphia PA Gebbie  Company 1883. Robertson D. How to Think Like a Roman Emperor The Stoic Philosophy of Marcus Aurelius Archived 4 August 2019 at the Wayback Machine. New York St. Martins Press 2019. Rohrbacher David. The Play of Allusion in the Historia Augusta. Wisconsin University of Wisconsin Press 2016. ISBN 9780299306045. Snchez Jorge Pisa. Breve historia de Hispania La fascinante historia de Hispania desde Viriato hasta el esplendor con los emperadores Trajano y Adriano. Los protagonistas la cultura la religin y el desarrollo econmico y social de una de las provincias ms ricas del Imperio romano Brief history of Hispania the fascinating history of Hispania from Viriato to the splendor with the Emperors Trajan and Hadrian. The protagonists culture religion and the economic and social development of one of the richest provinces of the Roman Empirepermanent dead link in Spanish. Ediciones Nowtilus S.L. 2010. ISBN 9788497637695. Stephens William O. Marcus Aurelius A Guide for the Perplexed. London Continuum 2012. ISBN 9781441125613. Stertz Stephen A. Marcus Aurelius as Ideal Emperor in LateAntique Greek Thought. The Classical World 707 1977 433439. doi
10.2 3074348712. JSTOR 4348712. Syme Ronald. The Ummidii. Historia 171 1968 72105. JSTOR 4435015. Van Ackeren Marcel. A Companion to Marcus Aurelius. New York Malden MA  WileyBlackwell 2012. ISBN 9781405192859. OCLC 784124210. Young Gary K. Romes Eastern Trade International Commerce and Imperial Policy 31 BC  AD 305. London Routledge 2003. ISBN 9781134547937. Y Yingshih. Han Foreign Relations in Denis Twitchett and Michael Loewe eds The Cambridge History of China Volume 1 The Chin and Han Empires 221 BCAD 220 377462. Cambridge Cambridge University Press 1986. ISBN 9780521243278. External linksedit Marcus Aurelius at Wikipedias sister projects Media from Commons Quotations from Wikiquote Texts from Wikisource Resources from Wikiversity Texts on Wikisource The Thoughts of the Emperor Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Marcus Aurelius Antoninus. Catholic Encyclopedia. Vol. 2. 1907. Marcus Aurelius Antoninus. Encyclopdia Britannica. Vol. 17 
11 th ed.. 1911. pp. 693696. Aurelius Antoninus Marcus. The New Students Reference Work. 1914. Greek Wikisource has original text related to this article   Works by Marcus Aurelius in eBook form at Standard Ebooks Works by Marcus Aurelius at Project Gutenberg Works by or about Marcus Aurelius at Internet Archive Works by Marcus Aurelius at LibriVox public domain audiobooks Marcus Aurelius at the Internet Encyclopedia of Philosophy Marcus Aurelius Antonine dynasty Born 26 April 121 Died 17 March 180 Regnal titles Preceded by Antoninus Pius Roman emperor 161180 With Lucius Verus 161169 Commodus 177180 Succeeded by Commodus Political offices Preceded by M. Ceccius Justinus G. Julius Bassus as suffect consuls Roman consul JanuaryApril 140 With Antoninus Pius Succeeded by Q. Antonius Isauricus L. Aurelius Flaccus Preceded by L. Marcius Celer M. Calpurnius Longus D. Velius Fidus as suffect consuls Roman consul JanuaryFebruary 145 With Antoninus Pius Succeeded by L. Plautius Lamia Silvanus L. Poblicola Priscus Preceded by Ti. Oclatius Severus Novius Sabinianus Roman consul January 161 With Lucius Verus Succeeded by M. Annius Libo Q. Camurius Numisius Junior v t e Roman and Byzantine emperors and empresses regnant Principate 27 BC  AD 235 Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Marcus Aurelius Lucius Verus Commodus Pertinax Didius Julianus Septimius Severus Caracalla Geta Macrinus w. Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Crisis 235285 Maximinus I Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip I w. Philip II Decius w. Herennius Etruscus Trebonianus Gallus w. Hostilian  Volusianus Aemilianus Silbannacus  Valerian Gallienus w. Saloninus Claudius II Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Florianus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Dominate 284610 Diocletian Maximian Galerius Constantius I Severus II Constantine I Maxentius Licinius Maximinus II Valerius Valens Martinian Constantine II Constantius II Constans I Magnentius Nepotianus Vetranio Julian Jovian Valentinian I Valens Procopius Gratian Theodosius I Valentinian II Magnus Maximus w. Victor Eugenius Western Empire 395480 Honorius Constantine III w. Constans II Priscus Attalus Constantius III Joannes Valentinian III Petronius Maximus Avitus Majorian Severus III Anthemius Olybrius Glycerius Julius Nepos Romulus Augustulus Eastern Empire 395610 Arcadius Theodosius II Marcian Leo I Leo II Zeno Basiliscus w. Marcus Anastasius I Justin I Justinian I Justin II Tiberius II Constantine Maurice w. Theodosius Phocas Eastern Byzantine Empire 6101453 Heraclius Constantine III Heraclonas w. Tiberius Constans II Constantine IV w. Heraclius  Tiberius Justinian II Leontius Tiberius III Justinian II w. Tiberius Philippicus Anastasius II Theodosius III Leo III Constantine V Artabasdos w. Nikephoros Leo IV Constantine VI Irene Nikephoros I Staurakios Michael I Rangabe w. Theophylact  Staurakios Leo V w. Constantine Michael II Theophilos w. Constantine Theodora II w. Thekla Michael III Basil I w. Constantine Leo VI Alexander Constantine VII Romanos I Lekapenos w. Christopher Stephen  Constantine Lekapenos Romanos II Nikephoros II Phokas John I Tzimiskes Basil II Constantine VIII Zoe Romanos III Argyros Michael IV Michael V Constantine IX Monomachos Theodora III Michael VI Bringas Isaac I Komnenos Constantine X Doukas Eudokia Makrembolitissa Romanos IV Diogenes w. Leo  Nikephoros Michael VII Doukas w. Andronikos Konstantios  Constantine Doukas Nikephoros III Botaneiates Alexios I Komnenos w. Constantine Doukas John II Komnenos w. Alexios Manuel I Komnenos Alexios II Komnenos Andronikos I Komnenos w. John Isaac II Angelos Alexios III Angelos Alexios IV Angelos Alexios V Doukas Theodore I Laskaris w. Nicholas John III Vatatzes Theodore II Laskaris John IV Laskaris Michael VIII Palaiologos Andronikos II Palaiologos Michael IX Palaiologos Andronikos III Palaiologos John V Palaiologos John VI Kantakouzenos w. Matthew Andronikos IV Palaiologos John VII Palaiologos w. Andronikos V Manuel II Palaiologos John VIII Palaiologos Constantine XI Palaiologos See also Gallic emperors 260274 Palmyrene emperors 267273 Britannic emperors 286296 Trapezuntine emperors 12041461 Thessalonian emperors 12241242 Empresses Augustae Usurpers Classical Eastern Italics indicates a junior coemperor underlining indicates an emperor variously regarded as either legitimate or a usurper v t e Pharaohs Protodynastic to First Intermediate Period 31502040 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Protodynastic pre3150 BC Lower Hedju Hor NyHor NiNeith HatHor Pu Hsekiu Khayu Tiu Thesh Neheb Wazner Mekh A Double Falcon Wash Upper A Finger Snail Fish PenAbu Stork Bull Scorpion I Shendjw IryHor Ka Scorpion II Narmer  Menes Early Dynastic 31502686 BC I Narmer  Menes HorAha Djer Djet Den Anedjib Semerkhet Qaa Sneferka Horus Bird II Hotepsekhemwy Nebra Nynetjer Ba Nubnefer Horus Sa WenegNebty Wadjenes Senedj SethPeribsen SekhemibPerenmaat Neferkara I Neferkasokar Hudjefa I Khasekhemwy Old Kingdom 26862181 BC III Djoser Sekhemkhet Sanakht Nebka Khaba Sedjes Qahedjet Huni IV Snefru Khufu Djedefre Khafre Bikheris Menkaure Shepseskaf Thamphthis V Userkaf Sahure Neferirkare Kakai Neferefre Shepseskare Nyuserre Ini Menkauhor Kaiu Djedkare Isesi Unas VI Teti Userkare Pepi I Merenre Nemtyemsaf I Pepi II Merenre Nemtyemsaf II Netjerkare Siptah Neferka Nefer 
1 st Intermediate 21812040 BC VIIVIII Menkare Neferkare II Neferkare III Neby Djedkare Shemai Neferkare IV Khendu Merenhor Neferkamin Nikare Neferkare V Tereru Neferkahor Neferkare VI Pepiseneb Neferkamin Anu Qakare Iby Neferkaure Neferkauhor Neferirkare Wadjkare Khuiqer Khui Iytjenu IX Meryibre Khety Neferkare VII Nebkaure Khety Setut Imhotep X Meryhathor Neferkare VIII Wahkare Khety Merykare Middle Kingdom and Second Intermediate Period 20401550 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Middle Kingdom 20401802 BC XI Mentuhotep I Intef I Intef II Intef III Mentuhotep II Mentuhotep III Mentuhotep IV Nubia Segerseni Qakare Ini Iyibkhentre XII Amenemhat I Senusret I Amenemhat II Senusret II Senusret III Amenemhat III Amenemhat IV Sobekneferu Seankhibtawy Seankhibra 
2 nd Intermediate 18021550 BC XIII Sekhemrekhutawy Sobekhotep Sonbef Nerikare Sekhemkare Amenemhat V Ameny Qemau Hotepibre Iufni Ameny Antef Amenemhet VI Semenkare Nebnuni Sehetepibre Sewadjkare Nedjemibre Khaankhre Sobekhotep Renseneb Hor Sekhemrekhutawy Khabaw Djedkheperew Sebkay Sedjefakare Wegaf Khendjer Imyremeshaw Sehetepkare Intef Seth Meribre Sobekhotep III Neferhotep I Sihathor Sobekhotep IV Merhotepre Sobekhotep Khahotepre Sobekhotep Wahibre Ibiau Merneferre Ay Merhotepre Ini Sankhenre Sewadjtu Mersekhemre Ined Sewadjkare Hori Merkawre Sobekhotep Mershepsesre Ini II Sewahenre Senebmiu Merkheperre Merkare Sewadjare Mentuhotep Seheqenre Sankhptahi XIV Yakbim Sekhaenre Yaammu Nubwoserre Qareh Khawoserre Ammu Ahotepre Maaibre Sheshi Nehesy Khakherewre Nebefawre Sehebre Merdjefare Sewadjkare III Nebdjefare Nebsenre Sekheperenre Bebnum Apepi Nuya Wazad Sheneh Shenshek Khamure Yakareb YaqubHar XV Sharek Semqen AperAnati Salitis SakirHar Khyan Yanassi Apepi Khamudi XVI Djehuti Sobekhotep VIII Neferhotep III Mentuhotepi Nebiryraw I Nebiriau II Semenre Bebiankh Sekhemre Shedwast Dedumose I Dedumose II Montuemsaf Merankhre Mentuhotep Senusret IV Pepi III Abydos Senebkay Wepwawetemsaf Pantjeny Snaaib XVII Rahotep Nebmaatre Sobekemsaf I Sobekemsaf II SekhemreWepmaat Intef Nubkheperre Intef SekhemreHeruhirmaat Intef Senakhtenre Ahmose Seqenenre Tao Kamose New Kingdom and Third Intermediate Period 1550664 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain New Kingdom 15501070 BC XVIII Ahmose I Amenhotep I Thutmose I Thutmose II Hatshepsut Thutmose III Amenhotep II Thutmose IV Amenhotep III Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb XIX Ramesses I Seti I Ramesses II Merneptah Amenmesses Seti II Siptah Twosret XX Setnakhte Ramesses III Ramesses IV Ramesses V Ramesses VI Ramesses VII Ramesses VIII Ramesses IX Ramesses X Ramesses XI 
3 rd Intermediate 1069664 BC XXI Smendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II High Priests of Amun Herihor Piankh Pinedjem I Masaharta Djedkhonsuefankh Menkheperre Smendes II Pinedjem II Psusennes III XXII Shoshenq I Osorkon I Shoshenq II Tutkheperre Shoshenq Takelot I Osorkon II Shoshenq III Shoshenq IV Pami Shoshenq V Pedubast II Osorkon IV XXIII Harsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Iuput I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Shoshenq VII Menkheperre Ini XXIV Tefnakht Bakenranef XXV Piye Shebitku Shabaka Taharqa Tanutamun Late Period and Hellenistic Period 66430 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Late 664332 BC XXVI Ammeris Tefnakht II Nekauba Necho I Psamtik I Necho II Psamtik II Wahibre Ahmose II Psamtik III XXVII Cambyses II Petubastis III Darius I Psammetichus IV Xerxes Artaxerxes I Darius II XXVIII Amyrtaeus XXIX Nepherites I Hakor Psammuthes Nepherites II Muthis XXX Nectanebo I Teos Nectanebo II XXXI Artaxerxes III Khabash Arses Darius III Hellenistic 33230 BC Argead Alexander the Great Philip III Arrhidaeus Alexander IV Ptolemaic Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy II Philadelphus Arsinoe II Ptolemy III Euergetes Berenice II Euergetes Ptolemy IV Philopator Arsinoe III Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra Ptolemy VI Philometor Cleopatra II Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Ptolemy VIII Euergetes Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Soter Cleopatra IV Ptolemy X Alexander I Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander II Ptolemy XII Neos Dionysos Cleopatra V Berenice IV Epiphaneia Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator Arsinoe IV Ptolemy XIV Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Roman Period 30 BC313 AD Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Roman 30 BC313 AD XXXIV Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Lucius Verus Marcus Aurelius Commodus Pertinax Pescennius Niger Septimius Severus Geta Caracalla Macrinus Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Maximinus Thrax Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip Decius Trebonianus Gallus Aemilianus Valerian Macrianus Minor Quietus Lucius Mussius Aemilianus Gallienus Claudius Gothicus Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Diocletian Maximian Galerius Maximinus Daza Dynastic genealogies 
1 st 
2 nd 
3 rd 
4 th 
11 th 
12 th 
18 th 
19 th 
20 th 
21 st to 
23 rd 
24 th 
25 th 
26 th 
27 th 
30 th 
31 st Argead Ptolemaic List of pharaohs v t e Stoicism Philosophers Zeno of Citium Cleanthes Chrysippus Diogenes of Babylon Antipater of Tarsus Panaetius Posidonius Seneca Cornutus Musonius Rufus Epictetus Marcus Aurelius more... Philosophical concepts Logic Logos Adiaphora Katalepsis Diairesis Physics Physis Fire Pneuma Ethics Pathos Apatheia Eudaimonia Kathekon Oikeisis Prohairesis Sophos Works On Passions Chrysippus Paradoxa Stoicorum Letters to Lucilius Seneca Senecas Essays Senecas Consolations Lectures Musonius Rufus Discourses of Epictetus Enchiridion of Epictetus Meditations of Marcus Aurelius Stoicorum Veterum Fragmenta Related articles Stoa Poikile Stoic Opposition Neostoicism Authority control databases International FAST ISNI VIAF WorldCat National Norway Chile Spain France BnF data Argentina Catalonia Germany Italy Israel Finland Belgium United States Sweden Latvia Japan Czech Republic Australia Greece Korea Romania Croatia Netherlands Poland Portugal Vatican Academics CiNii Artists MusicBrainz Te Papa New Zealand ULAN People Deutsche Biographie Trove Other SNAC IdRef Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleMarcusAureliusoldid1222494640 Categories Marcus Aurelius 121 births 180 deaths 
2 ndcentury philosophers 
2 ndcentury Roman emperors Aelii Ancient Roman adoptees Annii Augurs of the Roman Empire Aurelii Fulvi Burials at the Castel SantAngelo Deified Roman emperors Glycon cult Hellenistic writers 
2 ndcentury Roman consuls Moneyers of ancient Rome NervaAntonine dynasty Philosophers of law Philosophers of mind Philosophers of Roman Italy Philosophy writers Political philosophers Ancient Roman philhellenes Romanera Stoic philosophers Social philosophers Stoic philosophers Stoicism Greeklanguage writers Roman pharaohs Hidden categories Webarchive template wayback links CS1 Italianlanguage sources it Articles with short description Short description matches Wikidata Good articles Use British English from September 2018 Use dmy dates from April 2024 Articles containing Frenchlanguage text Pages using infobox philosopher with embed equal yes Articles with hCards Pages with Latin IPA Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images Wikipedia references cleanup from June 2023 All articles needing references cleanup Articles covered by WikiProject Wikify from June 2023 All articles covered by WikiProject Wikify All articles with dead external links Articles with dead external links from April 2023 Articles with permanently dead external links Articles with Spanishlanguage sources es Pages using Sister project links with wikidata mismatch Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource reference Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the 1911 Encyclopaedia Britannica with Wikisource reference Wikipedia articles incorporating citation to the NSRW Wikipedia articles incorporating citation to the NSRW with an wstitle parameter Articles with Project Gutenberg links Articles with Internet Archive links Articles with LibriVox links Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with WorldCat Entities identifiers Articles with BIBSYS identifiers Articles with BNC identifiers Articles with BNE identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with BNMM identifiers Articles with CANTICN identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with ICCU identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with KANTO identifiers Articles with KBR identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with Libris identifiers Articles with LNB identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NLA identifiers Articles with NLG identifiers Articles with NLK identifiers Articles with NLR identifiers Articles with NSK identifiers Articles with NTA identifiers Articles with PLWABN identifiers Articles with PortugalA identifiers Articles with VcBA identifiers Articles with CINII identifiers Articles with MusicBrainz identifiers Articles with TePapa identifiers Articles with ULAN identifiers Articles with DTBIO identifiers Articles with Trove identifiers Articles with SNACID identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers This page was last edited on 6 May 2024 at 0800 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width